From giveaways, amazing specials, to Cinco de Mayo food and drinks, and more, stop by Lowcountry Plastic Surgery Center’s new location today for the grand opening fun. Plus, if you give blood at the American Red Cross blood drive, you’ll also receive a $50 gift card! We hope to see you there!
About a year ago, a friend set up my first blog on, My Space. I had no idea at that time, what a blog was and my space was put together with a do it yourself template in less than three minutes. “What is the title of your blog?” my friend asked. The words “Princess Haiku" flashed into my mind, as I enjoy the aesthetic simplicity of poetic forms such as haiku and tanka. Of course I wasn't thinking all this consciously and was just selecting template color, lay-out etc. Before I knew it my first blog was waiting for me. All I had to do was enter it with mind, heart and spirit.
Mute/unmute: *4
Oh yeah, a little earlier, I called and talked to the Spanish teacher. And he said that Jake had mentally checked out of the class, and wanted to know what was going on. I said how he was Aspergers, and how he had mentally decided that the class was stupid and not worth his time. Not that I felt that it was, but that is how Jake sees it. The teacher, or someone, just needs to try and find a way to change Jake's opinion. Jake is a very factual thinker...
Hazel Dell Brewpub
“I can bring some roses if you want, I have friends who would do that.”, said Mr. Artist.
I guess I’ll just have to see who’s on duty that day.
As you may have noticed, the "Houx Dat" Nation is electrified tonight, in anticipation of tomorrow's big game! We have gumbo at the ready, and tons of munchies on hand, including a big black and gold King Cake ! I even designed shirts for our family to mark the occasion. All we need now is a great game, hopefully ending with the Vince Lombardi trophy going home to New Orleans where it belongs!
OHMYGOD THE CUTE. I CANNOT HANDLE.
Note: It is okay if another band member occasionally gets a song that they sing lead on (as Lee Sungyu did for Jaurim now and again), as long as there is distinctly one vocalist you could call the main vocalist for the group.
For that matter, the same could be said of "doodles", too.
Grab a hand-thrown whole wheat wrap, spread on some homemade Roasted Red Pepper Hummus (I always make a batch of this at the beginning of the week for moments like this). Add broccoli, romaine lettuce, spinach, pumpkin seeds, and drizzle with a teaspoon of balsamic vinaigrette. (should take you 3 minutes to do if you have everything in your fridge at hand) Or, add your own toppings. Whatever's around is what works best. Add onion, bell pepper, radish, kale, carrot, tomato, etc.
I’ve previously expounded on the many health dangers of aspartame, and all of those dangers apply equally to neotame. But as if aspartame wasn’t bad enough, NutraSweet “improved” the aspartame formula by adding 3,3-dimethylbutyraldehyde, which blocks enzymes that break the peptide bond between aspartic acid and phenylalanine, thereby reducing the availability of phenylalanine. This eliminates the need for a warning on labels directed at people who cannot properly metabolize phenylalanine.
If you call out for insight and raise your voice for understanding...
Thank you so much Elaine for sharing your design secrets with us. For more, pick up a copy of Elaine’s amazing style bible, Design Rules. I promise, you are going to love it.
If you are kind, people may accuse you of selfish, ulterior motives. Be kind anyway.
Bash bash smash, gimme a beer.
Whenever we hear about geek girl pin-ups, we’ll admit, we get a little skeptical. ‘Oh boy,’ we say to ourselves. ‘More objectification of women aimed at the stereotypical lonely male nerd. Everybody loses.’ So why are we talking about a geek girl calendar? Because these particular women are awesome, that’s why.
So when it comes down to it...conference was pretty good. A lot of the people were really awesome, and really gorgeous, and I wish I had been in a better mood to enjoy their company. We put together a few supercool parties and dances that were totally worth all the effort, and arranged way more workshops than I want to think about.
* Clean, but cozy
And other central banks are jumping in as well.
I hate the Gap. There, I said it. I can never find anything there and their jeans make my butt look like a moose face (don't ask for clarification, just trust me on that, OK?). Every time I have actually bought something at the Gap it has disintegrated in a matter of days, in the most dramatic way possible, like while I'm doing a book reading and my Gap cardigan suddenly implodes into a little pile of ash, leaving me in my bra in front of a large crowd, mumbling about how important it is to invest in high quality pieces.
Descoings passed away in New York last week, as I am in this town for my campaign to be President of the United States but also in France because I am binational. In France, there was last month a terrible attack against Jewish kids (4 deaths). I think it is connected. I wrote my letter to Jean-Louis Debre, President of the Conseil Constitutionnel, March 15 without a reply. He is a member of the UMP, the party of the President Sarkosy who is friend with Christian Estrosi, the mayor of my hometown Nice, and his closest partner, Eric Ciotti, President of the Alpes-Maritimes Department who is also AN ALUMNUS OF SCIENCES PO. Not coincidential.
We also parked at the free parking lot to walk to the library, which is about a 5-10 minute walk (depending on how many shinny things we see along the way).
Eating healthy is not always as easy as it may seem. Many foods that are pitched to us as “healthy” are anything but. As you look to improve your eating habits, be on the lookout for these Top 5 “Often Disguised As Healthy, But Harmful” Foods:
It is not possible to obtain similar documents from, say, German courts, and if the UK system purported to maintain similar privacy in court proceedings, one could understand the reluctance to make papers available. But we do not. We aspire to offer the same open justice as is offered in the United States. However, we fall woefully short of the example set by the US court system.
In the final chase scene, the production crew actually dropped a Ford Pinto Station Wagon from a helicopter nearly a mile in the air. They had to have a special certificate from the FAA to do so.
Advisor: Sorry Minister, that's political suicide.
I was standing on 5th Avenue when I heard he died and I felt my knees grow a bit weak. It was almost surreal -- whenever I'm in New York, The Beasties are on a constant loop in my head. Almost annoyingly so, as they are earworm fragments: "My man MCA has a beard like a billy goat/whoo whoo! Is the disco call/So I'm out pickin' pockets at the Atlantic Antic/And nobody wants to hear you cause your rhymes are so frantic/Homeboy, throw in the towel/ Your girl got d***d by Ricky Powell/ HEEELLLOOOO BROOOOOOKLYN!!!!" Yeah, constant, but still, it's what always happens to me in NYC and I like it. But suddenly it wasn't amusing -- it was sad. the Beastie Boys had created an image of new York City for me, and I have never been there without thinking of their "narration," and the legend they created surrounding it. And now one of its favorite citizens was gone. I sat in my hotel room and listened to "Paul's Boutique" and felt sad and old.
It really was dire. But the woeful miscasting of Sam Worthington as Perseus was what made it GI meets CGI.
and remember a fossilised trilobite
The negative references to Nazareth in the Gospel of John suggest that ancient Jews did not connect the town’s name to prophecy. Ne·ṣer is not the common Hebrew word for “branch,” but one understood as a messianic title based on a passage in the Book of Isaiah:
I made some inquiries and came up with a more promising idea. To save us the bother of travelling into town, the local supermarket delivered supplies to us every day. As luck would have it, the very same delivery van dropped off groceries at the Hibberd residence. This happened once a week, after the van had visited the circus. The opportunity for doping her food was obvious, but what kind of substance should be used? I took Smacker Ramrod (the circus vet) into my confidence, and he suggested a harmless compound that caused the urine to turn blue.
pronoia:
Marloes Coenen vs Romy Ruyssen
It’s easy for someone to say the chickens should be allowed to do what they want, especially when they don’t have chickens. We all draw a line somewhere that denotes our comfort zone. For some it is keeping laying hens in a moveable house, others it is a fixed house with free range during the day, and for some it is not keeping chickens at all and translocating their comfort zone onto someone else. What do I mean translocate? That term is used a lot in Management-intensive Grazing circles. In grazing the term is used to describe what happens when the livestock gets to camp out under the same shade trees, the woods, or in a barnyard instead of where the animal grazes. When the livestock is moved daily to a well rested, fresh pasture, the manure is placed directly where it is needed most – on the grass that needs replenishment. Now while we’re talking manure here, I’ll just not so politely interject that I think that it is a bunch of crap for someone to expect me to free range my chickens, when they don’t own chickens, period. I would be failing my husbandwoman duties if I was to let my chickens free-range. Sure, they would have more freedom and a greater variety of food. But, they also for sure would fall prey to predation (not a pretty sight), get in my garden, most likely water themselves at the water trough (too messy), and I would be forever hunting for eggs that I would be hesitant to use. And back to the money issue, when you invest $$ and your time in a flock of hens only to have months of work destroyed in a matter of hours, how sustainable is that? Sure the neighbor dog, resident coyote or coon or the ever present Red-tailed hawk is happy and probably sending off a donation to PETA as we speak, but how do you recoup that loss, and get over the guilt of letting a predator in one fell swoop (pun intended) ruin your egg dreams? I will pick the guilt of not free-ranging over the guilt of cleaning up after a coon has ripped the heads off of my beautiful hens any day. But it is a choice, based on my reality, not someone else’s. Some of you may be able to pull it off, but if you can’t, this is what works for us. See what you think.
Then it happened; one morning I was running a little short on time. While shaving, my hand got ahead of my brain, and BAM, that honed Japanese edge caught the bottom of my nose and layed open a flap of skin that instantly produced copious amounts of my vital fluid.
one love.
Fact; I think dudes with British accents are hawt; ♥
He recalls the Bruces, when they visited.
You have a mind, but it is not your own,
ANGELA: What should happen to her – how she should be hacked up. This is a mother who’s trying to take care of her children, and she’s a loving mother, so I don’t think anything should happen to her, heaven forbid, you know — because then, who’s gonna take care of all these children?
"It is horrifying to think of the number of rape victims in Gauteng who have been denied justice due to bad policing practice. These survivors of brutal sex crimes are now being re-traumatised as they realise their cases have not been properly dealt with by the police.
Starting in March 2012-March 2013 Heather and I will have a new block to share on the first Monday of every month, and in the end a new quilt!
What is it about Kelle Hampton that elicits such passionate, emotional responses? She’s like a new religion for some people, it seems. It’s fascinating, and disturbing. Let’s just be rational, people. Okay?
Most planetary astronomers I know are waiting with baited breath to see who Obama appoints as NASA administrator, as it will deeply affect future science policy. From reading the tea leaves, the guess is that there will a lot of new funding for Earth climate satellites and research...which also isn't such a terrible idea.
so they earn their curdled custard ice cream
Club Management
I will be sharing some of my daily experiences with you on this blog and talking about life in a professional Test Kitchen.I`m excited for this new chapter - nothing makes me happier than spending my work hours creating recipes, writing about food and talking about today's relevant food-related issues. I hope you will be joining me on this culinary journey!
Roy: I’m not asking you who’s on left wing !
Last Friday we went to Asilomar with my brother and his family, in from Virginia, and one of my sisters & her hubby, as well as Mom and Dad, to celebrate Mom's birthday. We had a lot of fun being together but it was EXHAUSTING too. Sleeping away from home was a challenge - the girls are used to sleeping on a full sized bed together but there they only had a twin, and the last night Sweet Pea fell out of bed three times. Additionally, the bed Slipshod and I were on was crap, so we didn't sleep very well. We also kept the girls up too late every night and they are still trying to recover from that. AND then there were the daily hikes. Unless you're carrying your two-year-old while she is sleeping, this is what hiking with a two-year-old looks like. Every five steps she does this:
When he came to the throne in 706, following his brother Bridei son of Derile (697-706), Nechtan son of Derile was well-versed in power, knew ecclesiastical ropes and how to wield them and understood the importance of allying himself with Rome. By contrast, the rustic, colonial Celtic church of Columba centred on Iona was fumbling along traditional lines, unaware of major changes happening with its powerful neighbor. In addition to works of its celebrated founder, Iona was famous for one other historical gem, without which we would all be lost in the Dark Ages. Iona kept a series of remarkable Chronicles.
at 5:30am to be precise.
Karl has written asking about the recent discovery of Gliese 581g, a potentially Earth-like planet:
-Brock spreads Cena’s blood on his chest.
So, I thought it would be fun to take a walk down memory lane and share some of my favorite projects from this past year.
This organization, which describes itself as “an umbrella for those who are free from religion and are committed to the cherished principle of separation of state and church,” is familiar to Blaze readers, as we’ve regularly highlighted its legal battles and harsh rhetoric against religious symbols on public property.
Where: Cafe Sierra at Hilton Universal City, 555 Universal Hollywood Drive, Universal City, CA 91608
You can find more info about our Betty MacDonald projects and events in the future.
I will share my positive outlook to lift others up during times of struggle.
I am still on a pay it forward/random acts of kindness mission...there is ALWAYS someone that needs an uplift! I like living a life that is filled with compassion, joy and giving with a dose of complaint free days (I am working on my part of living in a "Complaint Free World") I have a purple bracelet to remind me!
How do you get cooperation?
Workshop Operator Fails In Bid To Embarrass Guan Eng – Thursday, 12 January 2012 06:38 – Bernama
Take Paige to school
124. “Respect yourself and others will respect you.” – Confucius
Titled "If at First You Don't Appease -- Cry, Cry Again," the column is all over the place: from Iraq to pot-smoking hippies and -- of course -- Bill Clinton. But it starts with a discussion of Darfur, Sudan.
SO, I was glad that Crooked Timber weighed in. The relief for me was learning that–assuming the author is correct in his interpretation– when I accidentally stumbled across a decipherable point Poulos was making, I was actually correct in detecting an actual point. Hallelujah! I’m not stupid or insane!
# A Judicial Service Commission (JSC) meeting into their complaints against Cape Judge President John Hlophe yesterday failed to rule on whether their case had any basis;
Detroit, the largest city in Michigan, is about to join its sisters Flint, Pontiac, Benton Harbor, and Ecorse in being stripped of its municipal authority and ceded to an 'emergency manager.' Well-covered by commentators who can see, the story has also attracted observations such as:
Graphic 45's Le Cirque papers were just perfect for this album and if you take an extra close look you may discover another one of my projects in the making... ;)
January of 2012. What is that, a year and a half? 17 months, give or take? Whatever it is, that is when I start Beer School. In the mean time, I think I'll get brewing.
Please check for the customer reviews & ratings of Kyocera 1102J02US0 model FS-2020D 37 PPM Desktop B&W Laser Printer – Optional Networking with IB-31 card on the merchant’s website by visit the link below.
He therefore died in Germany (not Halifax as I had said).
A Taxi Driver
RESTAURANTS WITH FARM CONNECTIONS: 2nd Street Bistro, Livingston, MT; Amherst Chinese Food, Amherst, MA; Blackberry Farm, Walland, TN; Crook’s Corner, Chapel Hill, NC; Eve, Alexandria, VA; La Provence, Lacombe, LA; Lantern, Chapel Hill, NC; Pacific’O and I’o, Lahaina, Maui, Hawaii; Tree House Pastry Shop and Cafe, Santa Fe, NM
#NEEDABREAK
The percussion quartet who were banging on garbage cans with sticks under the one overpass in the university district lifted my spirit immensely but did not seem to lift my pace which had dropped off sharply from the first two-thirds of the race. The shallow downhill grade leading back to the John McDonnell Field did not lift my pace either. I thought entering the track of the team that has won 42 NCAA Track and Field championships would give me a psychological boost and it did, but it still did not lift my pace. Somewhere earlier, I had managed to pass a younger runner who had been pacing me beautifully for almost the entire race. I knew he was close behind me so I veered towards the outer lanes and motioned for him to pass saying that he had paced me the whole way and was going to finish ahead of me. He thanked me but then took off so fast I could not have stayed with him if I had wanted to. I guess he had some kick left! I struggled across the finish line in 2:21:55, almost three minutes faster than I ran at Winslow, and was woozy and unresponsive as the trophy gals gave me my medal and cut the timing chip off my shoe. I did wobble around long enough to regain myself and thank them, though, as I tried to do to all the volunteers around the course. They were awesome!
our whole world has been out of whack.
If the SC upholds Leila De Lima’s resolution, then guarantees must be put in place to make sure that DOJ does not overdo their power to restrict individuals facing charges locally from travelling. Malacanang must do its best to make sure that it is not perceived as being vindictive and acting like bullies by the public. A failure to do so will give Arroyo some room to elicit sympathy – something the former leader has not accomplished so far.
So these past few days aren’t completely filled with successes. Excited about finally getting my car back on the road, I decided to prepare the camera for my next adventure. I grab the memory card and immediately remember that I never deleted the pictures from a few weeks ago when Kristen and Carly were playing around with the camera. My first reaction is to hit format, but something stops me. I fight the urge to open the folder the pictures are stored in. Every part of me tells me not to do it. Finally, in a moment of weakness, I open the folder. There she is. All 18 megapixels of her smiling face and ample cleavage on my 23 inch monitor. It’s the first time I have seen her face in almost three weeks. I knew I wouldn’t be able to avoid seeing her face forever, but I never thought it would be by choice. I’m starting to wonder if I’m not really trying to find a solution to this problem as I am just avoiding it. It’s not like me to just back down and avoid conflict. Just ask the guys at work. They think I sometimes seek it out. How is it that I can stare down three managers at work and make them back away, but the mere mention of a visit from Carly can force me to flee my home? I’m still looking for the strength to delete those photos.
My disease’s getting worse.
handball games on the playground,
I can't imagine a better place.
3. Sizzle sizzle! Once the flesh is softer and the sugar has caramelised, turn each cheek 90 degrees so they'll have cross hatching.
Sadness *
Everybody is unique. Our DNA shows that no one person is alike. Personality is original, bodies are original. We may all fit in to a type or category (volumptuous, average and thin) but even then categorizing can be difficult and wrong.
1/4 cup caster sugar
The characters are well formed and believeable. I could identify with a few of the characters, they reminded me of people I know in real life. However, in the case of Topaz, there is a unique quality to her.
Almost Hitchcock-ian in feel, from the gloomy sets to the frightening murder scenes, it’s definitely one of the most memorable suspense thrillers from the old Hollywood classics. Audrey Hepburn’s wardrobe is to die for and she is just as ravishing and intriguing as her signature character from Breakfast at Tiffany’s with maybe a bit more intellect but with just as much charisma. Although in one of his last film roles, Cary Grant doesn’t disappoint in the role of the suave male protagonist. Notable for his gentle nature towards his female co-stars, this role is no exception and he is the perfect leading man, displaying all the favorable qualities that women dream of. All the other actors left a strong impression on me by the way they played each character with such depth and distinctness. The characters weave a heavy web around the audience and it’s not until the very end that you find out who each of them is. This is what makes this film a true classic and one that can be watched many times over especially with some accompanying humor on the side.
they were careful not to dirty their shoes.
“Last year, I flashed this badge and they let me through the police line. I parked just two blocks away,” John Sullivan says with a sly grin. As we slow down to take our exit ramp, John and I practice showing our press passes to imaginary parking guards, pulling the lanyards with cocky conviction and cool self-validation.
Living at The Fort we were isolated of lots of things. We didn’t see as many people, or saw lots of cars. It was very quiet for Indian standards. When we went to Goa, even just in the drive down from the forest, it was really fun to see all the kids in uniform coming and going from school.
This recipe makes about 18 kolaches, depending on how large you make them. And the variations are endless. For additional flavor you can soak the dried fruit in tea such as Earl Grey or you could sprinkle goat cheese on the apricot kolaches before baking. You can also make sausage and jalapeno kolaches by wrapping the three-inch flattened piece of dough around a two-inch piece of sausage and a couple of pickled jalapeno slices.
Tomorrow I am doing more homework & studying.
- A critique of your first three pages
Divide ingredients into 8 or 9 tortilla shells. Roll and wrap in tin foil -- ready to throw on the fire!
identify a solution. It can be toxic
against it, or consent to any that shall so do; but will timely discover
To sum up, this movie was solid gold. It should not have worked, I have no idea how it worked, I am impressed by every single person involved, and as a lifelong fan of Marvel comic books, I am just so heartened by the respect they had for us. They respected the audience, they didn’t hold your hand, they gave you tough moments and funny moments, and this is proof you can give the fans a movie what they want and still make it work for non-fans at the same time. Any flaws there are? Are completely eclipsed by what this accomplished. I can’t tell you how happy our sold out midnight showing was. We cheered, we applauded, we laughed. From a movie lover’s point of view, I’m thrilled. From a comic book fan’s point of view, I’m joyful. I am so excited to see where this franchise goes from here, and I’m on board anything they throw at me. Bring me Cap 2, Iron Man 3, Thor 2, a SHIELD movie, a Black Widow movie (PLEASE), anything you want guys and I am in. I am going to see this movie multiple times and it deserves every penny I’ll hand over. I came out feeling happy and satisfied and excited and there is no better movie experience than walking out feeling just that way. See Avengers, everyone. You might not be to my level of delight, but I swear it’s worth it if only due to the absolute fun!
The idea is that if you say something that's not that funny, say it again. Then again. Then again. At first you'll annoy people, but by the 37th time, they'll be rolling on the floor.
Summary: I’m not going to lie – I was surprised with this pick, but after seeing this guy and really looking at his film, he is great fit with The Raiders new OL philosopy and he has the skills to be a great player for the team. He has a good motor and work ethic, a high character guy. No injury issues.
“There's a lot of evidence showing that it's those of low socio economic status who bear a disproportionate burden when it comes to poor air quality,” Mowat noted. “So we know, for example, that people who self-report exposure to pollution, those who live within 200 metres of a major highway and those living near point source emissions are all much more likely to do poorly.”
Conference:
Just in case blogger decides to make mud puddles or cause us any trouble during your hopping enjoyment,
A childhood friend passed away
Here are just a few things that have inspired me:
And what's more relevant than the struggling artist - a metaphor for the instinct to explore and prosper and change things - banging his or head against the brick wall of fortune - until a possible solution appears?
The structure is based around best practice presentations and then small group work to solve problems and create action plans and to do lists to take back to the office.
lemonade stands
"20"
So that means with the right sketch, and the right hardware interface, and maybe a shield, you can do almost anything. Great!
When life throws you lemons apparently you should make lemonade. Life is throwing me tomatoes, so the obvious solution? Good old fashioned tomato sauce. By sauce I mean ketchup style, as opposed to something you might put onto spaghetti or pizza. I don't know why I suddenly have a craving to make this, I never have before, and Mum certainly raised a wry smile when I asked for some of her massive tomato crop.
I think everything is going to be alright.
Have I mentioned recently how much I love teaching fourth grade, especially from February on? Well, I am and I do.
It seems from the Scriptures that what we think of as inanimate objects, such as rocks, not only could speak in a given situation, but also hear what is being said.
Katie asked me if I had ever had a girlfriend (after I had said “I can see why Tom broke up with you” after she had been annoying me, but I did it in a joking way, and I think she knew that), and then went and told quite a few people. In front of me though, not behind my back, it was during a conversation of ours. She then went and said things like “she wouldn’t like it if she was 16 and hadn’t ever been with someone,” and various other things. She was trying to apologise, but basically just digging a deeper hole for herself. That annoyed me quite a bit anyway. It made me think of Heather and Melissa, and I got… not so much Angry, more frustrated and irritated. But you know the term ‘anger driving’? Well, I was basically anger skating. I must have been going quicker than ever before, fuelled by the thought of those 2 girls. The song “take a look at my girlfriend” coming on really didn’t help. Anyway, I basically knackered myself, and went to go and sit down with Elsa, Connor, Jon and Sophia.
Of galaxies, of comets,
Today, however, I bit off more than I could chew! Literally!
post "Creative Spotlight: You Inspire me..". Kiki manages
And he will be taking photos, and videos hopefully, and then we will show each other how we each manage media. And hopefully the media displayed on this web site will, as Emeril says, kick it up a notch – a little English understatement. Prince Harry Rocks! PPTBC is going to ROCK and ROLL over and play dead is not in the cards.
I thought I was living for a long time but till I found that special person I never knew I was just existing, waiting for a miracle to happen. And then… You happened… And now I feel that I’m alive, thanks to you now I breathe. You are the only soul that made my life complete. For that I cannot thank you enough. Be with me, in every step I take, Holding Me close to your heart, I know you will,
1. In a large bowl, combine the mayonnaise, pimento, Worchestershire sauce, grated onion, and red pepper.
Tonight we’ll be able to see the first signs of the new moon’s waxing crescent. A time for planting the seeds of thought for our new ideas and projects. Great night to meditate.
the Hertfordshire village of Thriplow
3 dl cream
6. Shabby Chic Cottage
Take heed, be safe and please be careful.
The movie has her character questioning Ptolemaic astronomy and investigating the heliocentric model of Hipparchos of Samos, and coming up with Kepler’s elliptical orbits as a solution to the problem of heliocentrism. This last part is probably fiction, but then Hypatia has been such a symbol of science and feminism for centuries that nearly every author has embellished our ideas of her.
Garnish with a lemon or lime slice, and mint leaves, if desired.
The “field work is beginning immediately,” acting Inspector General Charles Edwards said in a statement issued Monday.
Despite what you think you get from me
– ‘The 47 senators voting against the bill have received $23,582,500 in career contributions from oil and gas. The 51 senators voting to repeal oil tax breaks have received $5,873,600′.
Julie spent many years working in a tedious office job and knew that this was not how she should be spending her life. She is highly creative, zany, seriously gifted in the arts (she has extensive experience working with textiles and has painted many murals) and decided that she must spend her life away from the boring office environment and pursue her true calling, that of being an Artist. Having artistic talents in a myriad of areas, Julie’s quandary was what would she create, how would she channel her gift?
Road Record: 6-5
Fareda: He probably thought that torturing us would be of greater pleasure than strolling around the village. It is okay you can open the door. I’ve already hidden the papers.
After she was cooped up again I brought my 1:00 back, and gave him directions. "Go on back, 2nd room on the right, have a seat and I'll be with you in a sec" (I wanted to get a Diet Coke).
I was standing under a Hawthorn near a little pond a short distance from the tree line, I knew adult ceremonies took place here but at that age I didn’t understand them.
Jane was still sitting in her usual position, leaning against the headboard of her bed and hadn’t moved since Patti had been there earlier. Her face and pen were aimed at the same notebook, same as earlier. Patti would do her best to act like it was just a sick day and not let Jane think she was about to freak out with the expectation of expectation. She fought off a nervous smile and sat at the foot of the bed facing Jane.
What about food supply? How much do I have and how long will it last?
which sums up everything & nothing
So how he ended up using the bathroom in our hotel room is beyond me. Suffice to say I'd had a few drinks too many by this point.
Wow. It's been forever since I updated, so I will just do some basic highlights of my last few weeks to get myself back in the game.
Squish Super Amoeba (Squish #1) by Jennifer L. Holm and Matthew Holm. 2011. Random House. 96 pages.
172
Barry’s remarks Monday appear to track with his long-held views that the city needs to do more to reduce unemployment, particularly in neighborhoods east of the Anacostia River. Along with Barry, D.C. Mayor Vincent C. Gray (D) and a majority of the D.C. Council have embraced policies to require or encourage local businesses and institutions to hire more District residents.
When: Students report at 6:30 PM for warm up
It’s funny how, with all that “God uses nature to punish the sinners” stuff, it doesn’t seemed to have occurred to them that perhaps it’s their own “sins” – or maybe those of their hard-right, ultra-conservative, messiah, Rick Perry – that’s caused Texas to suffer through a near-record number of days with temperatures over one hundred degrees. But hey, I’m the crazy one here. They’re probably out dancing in the streets like water droplets on a hot griddle over Perry’s decision to run for president!
This program is no joke. It is HARD. You will be sore as hell for the first week or two. You have to really want to do it; otherwise, you’re wasting your money. Also, look at the “Fit Test” online to see if you’re ready to do the program. I thought I was in okay shape, but I barely passed some of their minimum qualifications for the program.
supply used: Bazzil cardstock-green, SU brown and red, orange was from stash, yellow-w r keeper paper, polka dot--SU green, black brad, paper clip from stash, washi tape from walmart,
After introducing ourselves to her via elephant fast food, we retreated to the tree ladder. Up we climbed, the elephant and her driver parked underneath, we clambered onto the hoodah and off we went.
You may or may not know her.
This is what I saw on the Palazzo Grassi, the day I handed in the manuscript of Talina in the Tower, a novel that features a greedy vulture called Restaurant, who lives in his ‘stake house’ on a remote island in the Venetian lagoon. The stakes are what he uses to impale his victims, so that he may dine on them at leisure.
3 litres Water (approx.)
In the meantime, we've just been keeping on. Our garden is in its usual winter hibernation, though with the cold frames I'm going to plant lettuce next week and see what happens. My kale made it through the winter in the cold frames which was nice. Even though it was 9 degrees this morning! Our kids are looking forward to getting some spring chicks to add to our flock in the next few weeks. And other than this morning when ice on our hill was too scary, I'm back to commuting on my bike as often as I can.
V5 is another of Luke’s summary statements: “So the churches were strengthened in the faith, and they increased in numbers daily.” Daily, incremental growth — numerically, spiritually — defines the early church.
In India alone, the cloud market is expected to increase from $400 million today to $4.5 billion by 2015, reports Indo Asian News Service. That growth could translate into 100,000 new jobs in India, according to a survey of CIOs in that country.
France and Russia are gone with the final push for victory about to begin. England runs the flanks (or at least the Mediterranean one) with the German armies forming the center of the line. Opposing England and Germany are one or more of the southeastern powers. If the southeastern opposition is smart and unified, they will recognize the Anglo-German threat and immediately try to occupy the provinces needed to hold a stalemate line. If they accomplish this, then Germany has no chance for victory and may become a victim if there is a change in alliances on the board. Barring this problem, it is a race between England and Germany for control of Europe and victory. Germany’s easy access to central Europe and its wealth of supply centers may be offset by England’s umbrella effect.
3.Transfer the pan to a rack and let cool for 30 minutes. Run the tip of a knife around the inside rim of the pan. Center a serving plate over the cake; carefully invert the the cake and plate. Remove the pan and peel off the parchment paper. Let the cake cool completely.
We know it is the only way real transformation takes place
Thus, we can learn from Bernard Weisberg’s career that an insistence upon looking for the good in others not only testifies to the best in oneself but also helps to suppress the worst in the world at large. Consider (by way of contrast) how revealing have been the recent allegations out of Moscow about the drugs and madness-inducing methods to which a supposed KGB defector was subjected in this country—allegations which inadvertently expose much more what goes on in the Soviet Union than what goes on here. And consider also how revealing has been the inability of the current South African government to see anything but foreign conspiracy and Communist agitation in the persistent efforts there to secure racial justice. Far more healthy is the Weisberg approach, which is that of the fair-minded judge who, in giving others their due, assures one and all of his own confident integrity and his professional competence. We should be reminded, by the illustrations from abroad that I have just used, of the grave risks run by systematically resorting to blatantly political tests for potential judges. Integrity and competence, not “ideological” partisanship, are what we should insist upon—and these we do have, in good measure, in the new Magistrate for this District, an officer whose virtues enhance the stature of this office for his successors.
I still feel a bit wrong-footed by this, though, and I've had to do some thinking about why this is...
Common Unschooling Questions Answered
Take a reading at the beginning of Genesis. Everything God did was done in abundant fashion! And when He was done He saw that it was good! Not good like what we think, but this good means that it was excellent and agreeable!
Good sense has prevailed in Romania! The government has agreed to return Dracula’s castle to the descendants of the legendary bloodsucker. It was surely wrong to deprive people of their property because their ancestor was a bit eccentric. We all have skeletons in our cupboards, quite possibly the remains of some night prowler who got a stake through the heart. Who really knows? My lineage is as untainted as they come, but even I can’t be certain there wasn’t a neck-nibbling gibbon in the Bananas family tree. Let he among you who is free from fangs suck his own toes.
“No, not at all, but understand that we have some real problems at our college campuses with political correctness, with an ideology that is forced upon people who, you know, who may not agree with the politically correct left doctrine,” Santorum responded. “And one of the things that I’ve spoken out on and will continue to speak out is to make sure that conservative and more mainstream, common-sense conservative and principles that have made this country great are reflected in our college courses and with college professors. And at many, many, and I would argue most institutions in this country, that simply isn’t the case.’
The Burger Shack and Blanc both serve great burgers from geographic locations I enjoy mightily. But lately, the trends I’m finding in Blanc are leading me to want to hit K10 for a jog down memory lane to my college days and the satisfying burgers available at the heart of Mass St. The Burger Stand is, without question, worth the drive for those of us still not over the burger craze in America.
Once we finally got an appointment with the doctor, we had Miss K back on track again at school. She was doing better with daily reminders from her teacher. Thank God for understanding teachers. After the diagnosis I was still apprehensive on filling the prescription and actually handing her a pill to take once or, in our case, twice a day. I thought I could still prayerfully make a difference and not medicate her.
The Mari would then chase the girls of the house, snapping at them with its jaws and the party enjoyed the food and drink offered.
They are at the doctor as I type this. And so I wait.
yeah, someone went shopping, and couldn’t wait to rock the new threads. i’m in l-o-v-e with these pants from the limited. i swear by the drew or cassidy fit. no other dress pants fit me as well. and trust me, when you work at a bank, you wear a lot of dress pants. i’ve tried banana, express, j crew, random stuff from target, elder beerman, and kohl’s…and who knows where else. probably gap, too. nothing fits me like the pants at the limited. they’re comfortable. they sit on my hips right. they accent the right things and hide the others. they’re perfect for me. and they make me feel confident. which, c’mon ladies, you’re with me on this one – if you can find dress pants that make you want to strut – you’re sold.
“Fine, I’m just a little taken by how tempting you look”. I could tell it caught her off guard. She blushed, but tried to ignore what had just been said. “What a twisted fuck”, I thought to myself.
Cantor: Romney will cut taxes which
Our Hollows branding and bottle in all it's glory. We wanted to give the label a detailed quality like the original jars often had, they contained lots of information and description. At the same time, to compete in the modern world, the name on the bottle needs to stand out on the shelf, or in the pub fridge.
I don't know about the other 'SAHM' or 'WAHM's (or what ever label you choose) but time seems so short!! Don't get me wrong I am not complaining, I get to see my Maisie more than I would if I had stayed in full time work at 'The Bank'. Funny though how time seems to have become the consistency of water and just keeps running though my hands. I am studious in thinking of what to put on my 'To Do' list .... I just have to find that damn pen.
16. (announcer)
Last week? Not an especially good week. Did I learn a lot? Yes. Mostly I learned that I have a lot more to learn. I don't mind that....just let me get some sleep while I do it, ok?
Eat and vomit. Pity mommy's girl =(
And then there's one with my husband sticking his tongue out. He ended up getting that hat for Christmas anyway!
We set off down Guardia Vieja in the hope of visiting Guardia La Vieja again. Unfortunately I had not checked, and it seems they do not open during the day. There are two “Organic” restaurants also on Guardia Vieja, but I don’t do organic. Carrot cake and lettuce leaf butties are not what I think of when thinking food in Argentina.
c) about five miles wide
Lindsey Paveo, Somebody That I Used to Know – I’m a HUGE fan of this song, but I didn’t love her rendition. The creepy clown guys on stage with her confused me too. Adam told her that he felt she was missing the power in the chorus, and I think that’s accurate. She seemed mellow the whole time, whereas when Gotye and Kimbra sing the song, there are some intense moments. I liked Lindsey during the auditions and battles, but I wasn’t impressed tonight.
I simply rubbed the crayons over the rubber stamp directly, misted it with water and stamped it directly onto the cardstock. It looks like the flowers have been water coloured. Love the soft and subtle effects.
Just about the time he was ready for a coffee refill, Mrs Maple shuffled back into the view, carrying Obadiah’s plate of omelette in one hand, propping herself along the counter with the other. Obadiah was hungry. It had been a week since he’d last eaten although it could have been longer, he was not too conversant on the days of the week. He shovelled his food down greedily, occasionally stopping to wash it down with coffee. He had exactly enough money in his pockets to pay for the omelette but he was hoping to offer Mrs Maple to work it off for her, maybe he could clean her yard or cut some wood for her, he thought.
The Queen's Vow by C.W. Gortner
7) Read more books/articles on being a good wife
I've always looked at Free Comic Book Day as an opportunity to try something that I might otherwise leave on the racks at the comic shop. On the first FCBD, I picked up Oni Press's offering, a reprint of the first issue of Hopeless Savages, which has since become one of my all time favorite comics. So, I passed by the Marvel and DC offerings this year to grab some intriguing looking books from other publishers.
and some times
My original title was "True Love after 22 years" and when I showed Hubby the layout, he said, "What?? It took you 22 years to love me?!?!?" lol. So I added "still" in front of "true love" (thank heavens for alpha stickers!)
Aunt Sue is a bona fide cowgirl (same as Uncle Mead, but with female parts) and a champion barrel racer with incredible saddles and gleaming belt buckles the size of tombstones to show for it. Her prize barrel racing horse is Scoot. Scoot is 27, and now out to pasture with his mare. Even while out on the road taking care of business from rodeo to rodeo, he demanded his mare accompany him or the show would not go on. I tell you, the requirements of celebrities these days. But you don't want to sit on top of a cranky, 1,200-pound diva while careening around barrels through churned dirt.
and the results could vary between striking music-making and
See, Muffy inherits the property on her next birthday, but the place is pretty expensive to keep up. Muffy, after doing some research, came up with the idea of opening up the mansion as a bed and breakfast, with a roleplaying/murder theme. As each person was "killed", they were told what was happening, and even helped Muffy plant clues and scare the others. Oh, and Buck is a makeup artist and the Constable is Uncle Frank, but the old man running the ferry is just a guy who runs people to and from the mainland.(Oh, and we also find out that it was the ferryman who saved Arch from the snake...and that Arch shit his pants. TMI...)
Ok, so I admit that yesterday’s blog post was bit over dramatic, and perhaps just a little bit self-indulgent. But hey, a girl has to have days like that every once in a while. What I like most about all this writing is that it helps me work through some of the challenges that I’m facing. Even though I want to be a happy, cheery, funny Jackie all the time, there are gonna be days when, darling readers, you may come across a less cheerful blog post. Thanks to everyone for their wonderful words of encouragement and love yesterday. I’m happy to tell y’all that I left the pity party and moved on.
At the same time, what right do they have to destroy the world?"-Derrick Jensen
Yes you!!!! Thank you so much for making this house a home for me, my son and our animals!!!
I’m not going to be overly precious about this method. Basically, toast pine nuts and blend with the garlic until creamy. Add the basil, some salt, and blend again. Add cheese and blitz, pouring in olive oil until combined. Lemon juice, again to taste, and pepper.
Do you like kid?
Let me be clear, the exhibition (vendor) hall is huge - probably 200 yards to a side with 15 or so rows - huge. We spent easily 2 hours walking it yesterday and didn't play test any demos and only got to the halfway point. Granted we did spend a few minutes talking to Larry Elmore while getting him to sign some prints.
I’m safe writing this because this person will never think that they have done anything wrong. They will go on thinking that they have done me and the running world a favour. How wrong they are.
The kids enjoyed learning about the real meaning of Easter (while getting to much on a few jelly beans) We also wanted to share what we learned with friends and the members of our congregation. So the kids packed individual bags of jelly beans for all the members of the congregation, (tip; Brachs' jelly beans have all of the above colors) we then stapled a copy of our poem. The result was a fun (and tasty way) to share about Jesus this Easter.
When have you experienced anxiety? How did God’s consolation bring joy to your soul? Did He do it through His Word? Through other people? How did you overcome your anxiety? How can you use your experience in a personal experience piece? How can you use it in a meditational/devotional? In poetry?
It probably doesn't look that exciting, but I find rocks and farms aesthetically appealing and inspiring. While Pete drove, I jotted down verses of country ballads which I might sing, if I was that way inclined!
Today.. it’s the 4th day of Chinese New Year
I was trying to get a “biological” feel, yet keep the idea of a network that could process bits and bytes of information. The dots are actually little spherical lenses. Different lens shapes pick up the light strongly at different conditions. The lenses also create light patterns within the painting.
Elrich conceded that the “curfew loses if it’s strictly a data discussion” — and also conceded that he didn’t believe it would have much effect on flash mobs:
Divide into ramekins and put in freezer for at least one hour.
Cue a phone call to J for him to come home from the hospital to take me to the same hospital as I couldn't see properly to drive myself there, a wait of less than an hour, eye drops and an eye exam.
Robert Passero CLU, ChFC provides point-of-sale and case consultation in a variety of advanced markets areas. His extensive knowledge of products and sophisticated product illustration techniques make him a valuable resource for insurance reviews, complex product issues and illustration design for Metlife’s Wealth Advisory Group.
I know this to be true as I felt I was Christian while I was Mormon. At that time I adhered to Mormon doctrine and my belief that I was a Christian. I now adhere to biblical Christian views and consider myself to be a true follower of Jesus Christ, a true Christian.
This is a picture I took at a Halloween Party hosted by Rasmussen back in 2009.
The great weather we have had lately has made it more possible to pretend it's summer.
The male novelist is implicated, as well
Row 1: ch3 (counts as a first dc), place marker if you wish, *(skip 1 ch stitch, dc in next ch, ch1)* repeat from *, join with a sl st in the top of ch3
Entries for challenge 18 close at midnight (EST) on Tuesday, June 22nd.
The five scholarship recipients will also receive a student gift package of
i know that I have been absent from here lately....Things are just crazy right now...
Line an 8" rectangular loaf pan with foil, allowing excess to hang over edges. Grease foil with non-stick cooking spray, and set pan aside.
As soon as we arrived, we hopped upstairs and sampled the delicious wines of Blackbird Vineyards, and took in the sights. Art and antiques met us at every turn. It was hard to stay focused on any one thing for very long before some new fantastic thing caught my attention. We took our time wandering, finally making our way out to the beautiful garden.
Overall, a very simple image, and coloring was really quick (scanning and writing the tutorial took a lot longer than coloring the image!) I hope you have as fun and easy a time coloring it as I did.
Knopf Canada, 2011
This gets obscured in vapid rhetoric, as illustrated by the DemocracyNow debate, when panelists challenge the meaning of words like “movement” and “we”. It may sound clever to say that this is not a movement, it’s an attempt to stop things. It might even be wise to re-consider words, since they can limit creativity as well as enhance it. But really. Most past movements have been attempts to stop things. What is a factory strike, after all, except an attempt to stop production? Being clever with words doesn’t change the underlying reality.
makes 3 dozen cookies
"This is clearly not the work of a legitimate civil rights organization, but much more along the lines of an espionage group," he said.
The truth is, there are very few women, I'm willing to open myself up to, and so begins the manners of being polite and asking, "How are you?" As they tell me about their burdens, I struggle to be present and not check out and I find myself retreating to the inner depths of my soul, discovering that I am already over capacity.
Will turned to face them, the melody dying on his lips. "Welcome to the house of the Baba Yaga."
Confused? Good. You're keeping up.
Then the PCs saw a grisly scene: the various wights and lich-things in here had been busy torturing and disemboweling Grand Vizier Krock, who was strapped down to the Prince's former bed. Sadly, in addition to physical torture, the gang of wights had also somehow turned Krock undead; he was no longer human, and his eyes glowed with the evil hunger of the cursed not-quite-living. Out of mercy, Innominus ended the poor Grand Vizier's suffering by turning him; the vizier finally died a true death, falling back on the counterpane, and was at peace.
Ethan Wingfield (REP) 11.30% 400
In short, we don’t yet know.
Based on the answers provided a decision will be made as to whether PAYE/NIC rules apply
I felt silly showing the rocks to Sparky, but he didn't hesitate. He put them on the workstand, and then took the knives from me again. As he ran his hands over them, paying particular attention to the blade of the kukri with his fingertips, all doubt left me. i knew he was seeing the knives the way i saw them, with all their spirit and positive energy. i was about to get the best tattoo i could have gotten anywhere in the world.
“How are you?” She said it with a measure of compassion, as if she weren’t holding back years of boiling anger. As if she didn’t have something else she wanted to ask me and wasn’t just setting the stage for the coup de grâce.
I think that my discretion is based on a conversation with a friend of mine. I was checking out his band's page on MySpace, and among his “Friends” was Metallica and Marilyn Manson. When I asked him about his “Friends”, he said that it has more to do with illustrating your influences. “Aaah...” (cue: light bulb) From there, I figured that I should pick my associations sparingly.
Anyway, with the dispute between “scone” and “scone” resolved conclusively in favour of “scone” I am satisfied that the next time I write to the BBC demanding that they sack a presenter for saying “scone” then my complaint will be taken rather more seriously.
This is insane. It really is. The numbers are all out of proportion with any rational notion of defense. And there are ways to cut military spending that do no affect any rational notion of military or security defense. In fact, in 2010, there were four different proposals of how you can cut military spending.
My daughter had a tumor removed from her ear. My wife had a nasty stomach infection.
Elise -YES YES YES YES —- (Notice… the only woman…..hmmmm)
Me: No. I am afraid of them. That’s what makes me quiet. Your words… “He will try to do something to shut you up or make you lose that baby”. They are my reality. But I have to go. I have to.
Why? What does an Author App do for you? Bundle your books? Gives you the right to say you have an App? How does it help your discoverability? How does it increase your sales? Ah, you say people go click on the sample books inside the App. This is true, if they loved the book. But the key is getting them to download the App in the first place…back to how does your App get discovered? I’d like to hear from any authors who have apps and how they are working for you.
The Platinum pack offers additionally, book returnability, New York Review of Books and Newswire advert. Free author copies are set at 250 paperback and 25 hardback, again, there is an increase in the press and marketing outputs. The price, $12999.
"Holding. Hah. Is that what they told you?" His fixed grimace twitched as if he was trying to sneer.
Some would argue that the very replacement of one race or culture with another is an act of genocide in itself. However, in addition, the inevitable mass displacement and interbreeding which is already occurring will further undermine Europeans as a homogeneous ethnic group. (an outcome, some so brainwashed and mired in their foetid ideology actually view as a desirable outcome)
A little longer, won’t you stay?
Funny thing about this map...when I was showing the book on YouTube and got to this map, I'm glad I read part of it. Turned out I forgot to show the secret hidden pocket I made for the Star Wars page. I had to go to back to show it...but I guess you could say the map worked! Ha ha...
2. WikiLeaks uncovers another possible Vatican scandal – The Vatican originally agreed in writing to take up observer status with the International Task Force on Holocaust Education, Remembrance, and Research, referred to as the ITF. Then, according to a U.S. diplomatic cable from WikiLeaks, they reneged on the agreement amid controversy over the role of the war-time pope.
I decided to go a little nuts with the paint choice and chose Kaleidoscope orange from CIL paints.
“Mornin’ to ya, Vernon,” Abby said with a sad nod. “But not one of our better mornin’s, ain’t so?”
In a food processor combine the mascarpone cheese, strawberries, sugar and lemon juice.
She is back home now, up stairs absolutely shattered. She did get the right bus home, she didn’t lose her return ticket and they all had a fantastic day!
Written-By - A. Cyrille*
I wrote this blog entry for my other blog the day before I moved into my college dorm room for the first time.
¨ Duck Confit Pizzetta with Arugula and Shaved Farmhouse Cheese Served with Bump in the Night Cascadian Dark Ale"
Shakespeare could not even spell his own name the same way every time he wrote it – he used various spellings. As far as I understand it, English spelling had no need to be uniform until Dr Johnson published his dictionary in 1755 – and, even now, we are in the anarchic position of having “humour” and “humor” and “colour” and “color” being correct in different places and how the fuck did “programme” and “program” and “aluminium” and “aluminum” ever come about? They’re relatively new concepts!
Some of you might be wondering why Huťko did not report on two most interesting CJEU cases of this beautiful summer - L´Oréal v. eBay C-324/09 and Interflora C-323/09. The main reason is the complexity of said cases. Summing them up in two separate articles would be just not enough to cover everything. And after all, they both have been so widely reported and analyzed. Therefore, Huťko decided to focus on less discussed parts. This article will then cover such issues of L'Oreal v. eBay.
The SADDEST part of the trip is that I MISSED Ali Edwards. :( That's the one person I really, really wanted to meet. Next year, it'll be the FIRST thing Stephanie and I do, lol! But I did get to see real and crafty celebrities!
Turns out she's breathing fine and faking being unconscious. Here's a hint, to pull that off you need to keep your legs still. A nurse waves an ammonia capsule under her nose for a good 20 seconds and the patient does an admirable job of pretending not to smell it. Finally gets to her though and she rears up coughing. Turns out she's likely having a self-induced anxiety attack. It's actually quite easy to make your body freak out. Hyperventilating on purpose will do the trick nicely.
Throughout we are reminded of the bravery and selflessness of the men and women who chose to serve our country and defend our liberties while their own freedom was withheld. At once a testament to the wrongs of the policy and a celebration of the good that endured in spite of it, Our Time marks the start of a new era in our national history.
Naja Diamond — Naja is a newbie to me! After discovering her from last week’s BDIB challenge, I decided to give her the award. Like her style and figured you guys would too!
Well as you know Monday began the Chinese New Year's. This means all gov't offices are closed ALL week....ugghhhhh. The last signing of documents would have been Friday which puts a delivery of this week Monday or Tuesday. Unfortunately we did not receive our TA so now comes a horrible wait. Gov't offices don't open until next Monday and then with travel time for the documents our agency said they won't be seeing any TAs for 2 weeks if they get right in and sign away and send out right away, I won't be holding my breath.
"How long since this happened?" She hadn't been out of the cell for more than five minutes. Focussing on the easy, First-Realm connection between the Witnessing and the room they stood in, she could feel the ruffled edges of Realmspace where the Gateway had been.
Recently, adventure found me. I never expected work to be as exciting as this. It was the closest I got to the “peace process.”
your local hardware store and attach it to the end.
I received a request to write an article on developing intelligence networks, but I've got to tell you, I really don't feel qualified to do so. If any readers are former intel guys or cops and feel up to it, I'd be happy to edit and publish it, attributing it however they would like. Otherwise, when I get an opportunity, I will do my best to cover the subject, at least in how I've personally gone about developing my networks. --J.M.)
So I was in Ohio two weeks ago, and everybody there was so incredibly nice. Someone I met in San Diego even gave me the bag with my artwork on it that they were giving away at San Diego that I never got at the time. I got asked about my blog, and I feel like I forgot why I started it in the first place. Sure, there's headaches, but ultimately it's about all the people who I meet at shows, and online who are so supportive and positive.
IMPORTANT CAMPAIGN UPDATE!!!
I really have the best mom in the world and I know that if Aidan had lived, he would have been the most spoiled child ever because not only would he have been spoiled by Andrew and me, but by my mother as well...and even though that chance may have been taken away, we are still taking every opportunity to spoil him....he is the only child out there with a huge arrangement and a granite lined bronze vase (not in the picture under the grave blanket).
So it strikes me we need a better word than "Supermoon" to describe this marginally large and indistinguishably brighter moon. I'd suggest "moon". Or, if you want to get all over-excited, "full moon".
Understandably, our longest-standing and most steadfast friends in Poland and Israel shuddered with every deceitful word.
The photo booth immediately caught my eye. Ya’ll gathered in front of a screen, it took 4 shots, and they appeared in the tiny, tiny printer as postcards. Oh, yeah, and they were also sent to The Nerdery’s Facebook page!!!
The Keynesian notion that a government can spend its way out of a deficit is, one hopes, now dead. The Roosevelt administration embraced Keynes, a British economist, throughout the 1930s and the result was the Great Depression.
Josh re-did some things in our front yard last weekend and it looks WAY better. We had neglected it for quite some time, so it was very much needed!
Then again, it could piss straight into the wind,
1 In the days of tor, there was many donkeys.
I’ll try to update more often.
Her vital signs began to improve almost immediately after surgery, but still had a ways to go. Since then her vitals are mostly in the 'normal' range with a couple of exceptions.
Julianne was born in Toronto, Ont., where she still lives, and was the only girl in a family with four children.
Neither Muck or Finn, nor any of their friends had ever actually seen Billy Reed’s Bull. But the terrible bull scared them even more than being hauled into the principal’s office, not that they’d ever been there.
I roll my eyes, Brit is always up to some sort of shenanigans. I collect my stuff & wander inside to change out of my sweaty grass covered clothes and text her to see what exactly I was supposed to wear to this afternoon of debauchery that I was being kidnapped for.
By the time C came home around 5-ish I was in tears, okay I was sobbing! I had just got done "yelling" (I could not yell but I did the best I could to let them know I was TICKED) at my kids telling them how terribly sick I was (for some reason they had not noticed at all) and that all I wanted for today was to feel better and that having children that would play nice and love each other would have helped me a ton. Yes, I laid on the guilt!!! They deserved it. Daddy walked in just after this conversation saw how awful I looked and heard about how awful they had been that day and then he began to make them feel guilty as well, like I said, they deserved it.
shells
A Boyfriend for Christmas ... LMN ... 10 PM
5. What is your favorite flower?
Absolutely not! :) You can just study God's Word and keep notes. You do not have to create a thing! I personally love the creating part and someday my kids can have these pages too as part of my faith legacy. For those of you not creating pages, etc., you may just want to keep a journal of each hymn and scripture along with your study notes.
this site is the brain child of Angi Barrs and Yvonne Yam
Cross says he always wanted to be a writer. For most of his life he spent much of his spare time writing – from his days being bullied and bloodied in the Scottish schoolyard, through delinquent teenage years back in Bristol, then a half-decade and more happily languishing on unemployment, to completing Bachelors and Masters degrees at Leeds University, and then working at a publishing company.
That being the case, I’m going to offer a strong warning to potential readers: the good in this book is more than matched by the bad. Winter’s Bone is like a dark road full of sharp rocks. You will inevitably cut your feet. And I can’t say with certainty that the destination is worth it.
I hope these images show up well enough on your monitors.
sugar as per your taste ( i didnt add any as i had used sweetened condense milk which was enough sweet )
I still can’t wear regular shoes. I’ve been wearing moccasins even when they completely don’t match because oh the pain. But I have all my toes.
17. Learn to say no. She may pitch a fit today, but someday you’ll both be glad you stuck to your guns.
Ink - Daffodil Delight, Soft Suede, Peach Parfait
Dr. Swank would never say that the only thing you need to do is pray; one has to also work intelligently in partnership with God. In our work with churches that are effectively funding their vision we know the value of good planning and practical strategies—some complex and some simple—that lead to success. We have a whole program built on fundraising strategies that work.
The "Really, You Thought I Submitted that??" T-shirt. We know you never send out the manuscripts your clients pay you to represent--but they don't. Commemorate this important facet of your business with our stylish, 100% cotton T-shirt in Small, Medium, or Large--or just say "Scammer-size me!" and we'll bump you up to Extra-Large. For men and women...because scamming is an equal opportunity profession. Only $15.99.
2 tsps vanilla
At the FOTA Fans Forum, which was held the McLaren Technical Centre (MCT) in the UK last Thursday, one of the sections was on the technical side of the sport. It was refreshing to hear these people admit that F1 needs to open up more on the technical side. As the sport and the cars are so fascinating technically and not just mobile billboards for the Marketing departments. Their comments (below) echo what I have found when talking to the teams designers and technical directors, even people at the lower level of the technical want to get more of the technical message out to fans. However at some point the the paranoia of secrecy and the apparent unwillingness of the Teams PR depts, do not always allow journalists access to these people.
3 Milano 10:21
I have spoken with a great number of musicians and bands as to whether it is better to use the words touring schedule or tour over gig schedule, dates, appearances and so on. While it can sound cool to tell people you are on a tour, it can also potentially hurt you in the eyes of some event planners, talent buyers, booking agents and management groups.
At first, the Italian police attributed this terrorist act to the Red Brigades, but ultimately Gladio was pronounced guilty. A month and a half later, during Oktoberfest in Munich, there was another act of terror. Colonel Klaus Fishner, a former employee of the counter-intelligence service of Stasi, said: “The task was to create tension in NATO countries and to suppress any political left-wing deviation.” As we can see, that was the mission, aimed at justifying the existence of the secret army.
1 approximating
This post is not *just* a shameless piece of self-aggrandizement (see prevous post) but after nearly 8 years here, E@L is forced to admit that he agrees with the opinions expressed in the following article.
15. Love Me or Leave Me
There used to be a small independent bookstore in my town but that closed too, a devastating loss to the community. I think it’s a horrible situation, are the only bookstores on-line now? That seems sad to me.
* California Division of Land Resource Protection * California Division of Law Enforcement General Library * California Division of Measurement Standards * California Division of Mines and Geology * California Division of Occupational Safety and Health (Cal/OSHA) * California Division of Oil, Gas and Geothermal Resources * California Division of Planning and Local Assistance * California Division of Recycling * California Division of Safety of Dams * California Division of the State Architect * California Division of Tourism * California Division of Workers Compensation Medical Unit * California Division of Workers Compensation * California Economic Assistance, Business and Community Resources * California Economic Strategy Panel
The film stars Reese Witherspoon, Chris Pine, Tom Hardy, Til Schweiger, Chelsea Handler, John Paul Rattan and Abigail Spencer – with McG onboard as director – what was it like working with the cast and crew on-set? Any good anecdotes?
I think I snarled at him. Showed all my teeth. Hissed with all the Spit I could muster that I Did Not Need Any Help At All, Thank You Very Much. Type of thing.
So here, friends, is something that’s been a bit scarce around here lately: A recipe bonanza! Three recipes, all forgotten and rediscovered in some fashion, and all deserving of a place on Red, Round, or Green.
Let's just hope our "cycles" don't collide!! LOL
Essie Merck once lived on the property where this block is displayed. For generations, this site was the original Six Mile Community Post Office and farm of the Merck family. The current owner of the property, Cindy Blair, chose the pattern to honor Essie, but changed the original colors. The pattern reminds her of the old Granny Square afghans her great-grandmother, Minnie Gokey, crocheted in colorful florals with a black background.
Pepper spray cop, pepper spray cop, where have you been?
Flash & The Pan Midnight men AUS
Back tomorrow with more featuring today's releases. See you then.
Recently re-formed, following a fantastic early tour of 2008, the incredible power-pop rock trio Dodgy will perform on Saturday evening on the main stage sponsored by Commercial Radio. With 12 top 40 singles and 3 top tens including the catchy “Staying out for the Summer” and “Good Enough” – the latter still a staple of radio playlists – GuilFest are delighted to welcome them back to the 2008 festival.
It forced them to look at their spending habits and analyze what the hell was going on.
I recently read another article on the dangers of information overload. In my view there cannot be too many articles on information overload as this is a serious problem. This Newsweek article1 is quite good. It reported the reseach of the Director of the Center for Neural Decision Making at Temple University, Angelika Dimoka, who employed brain imaging (fMRI) techniques to examine how the brain respond people are trying to make decisions when they are severely overtaxed. She found that activity in the dorsolateral prefrontal cortex, a region behind the forehead that is responsible for decision making and the control of emotions, suddenly fell off when the information load increased. It was similar to a circuit breaker popping. Now activity in the parts of the brain registering emotional activity, the parts of the brain normally kept in check by the dorsolateral prefrontal cortex, ran wild. So the research participants made stupid decisions and their anxiety levels soared.
I started by stamping on a small piece of white cardstock. It's hard to see in the photo but I used Antique Linen Distress to stamp a background behind the tower. The leaves and flowers are coloured with distress inks and I went outside the lines with the sponging on purpose. Next I used a light grey copic and gave PARIS a shadow which also made them stand out more.
Pink blouse: free from aunt
So there, my dear half-zebra-half-horsies, is the extent of my knowledge when it comes to hemming knits! This was one of those sewing tasks that I lacked confidence in for a lot longer than I should have. As with many things, finding the right tool and notion really helped out!
It's nice to have this be a part of the requirement. Make sure labels include the title of the lesson, what parts are inside, what materials need to be gathered, and who created the lesson.
Dixons may have wishful thinking and hopes of outperforming their markets and gaining share, but taking in Pixmania could turn against them.
"Of course not, sir." Riker grinned in an attempt to hide his nervousness from his captain. In a rare mischievous mood this morning, Picard had asked the first officer to accompany him to the transporter room to meet their guests. "I believe you will know one member of the team," Picard had said with a smile, giving no other clue as to who would be visiting the ship.
I'ts like nothing I've ever known
By Tommy Coca
Also, thought I'd throw out this random tidbit. If you wear a running band for your phone or mp3 device, make sure you don't put it on too tight :o). Friday morning I went out for a run, and it was a little chilly, maybe 40-45 degrees? Nothing terrible of course, it actually felt pretty good. Except for the fact that my left hand WOULD NOT warm up. It was painfully cold the entire four miles. When I got home I told Chris that my hand was still freezing, but when he felt it, only my thumb, pointer finger and inside of my wrist up to my elbow was cold. Ice cold actually, and somewhat hard to move, or kind of numb. But the outer side of my arm was fine.
Neassa and I were looking for a washing bowl that we couldn't find anywhere, even though we'd seen them displayed in the kitchen section and in the catalogue; everyone we asked kept sending us to other departments and by the end we must have walked round the store two or three times in our search. Finally we gave up and decided it was time to go home and headed to the check out where we were shocked to realise that we had been in the store for six hours! How had that happened? And how come we hadn't got the one thing we had come for? It was too much for Neassa to bear and as we were standing in line she decided to make one last attempt to find them; she went racing off and was gone for quite a while and just as I was wondering how I was going to pay for her purchases that I had put onto the conveyor belt, she came flying down the shopfloor, triumphantly wielding two black washing up bowls; success at last! Now that's what I call determination!
So to help combat the fatigue, I have had to limit myself to one, maybe two "things to do" in a day besides the usual feeding and caring for my two busy boys. Yesterday, my project of the day was laundry. Today, I went on a field trip with my sons preschool to the fire station. I felt pretty good after wards so I pushed the limit and went to the grocery store. Whew! Let's just say, the my little hiney is glued to the recliner. It's gonna' take some thing really good to pry me off of here.
30th April 2012
I enjoy listening to this CD when I need a spiritual pick up – a lifting up of my mood and spirit – sort of like the caffeine jolt my body experiences from the 2 cups of coffee I drink every morning. The only difference is the jolt that I experience from the music of My Kings Ransom not only affects my body in a positive way as it gets my toes tapping to the beat of each song but it also affects my emotions and spirit leaving me feeling the better for having taken the time to listen to the CD.
I vowed to myself that turning 30 would mean no more B.S., no more masochist ways. I wanted, NEEDed to have a real relationship, and get married. Going to Hawaii was a reward for such accomplishment!
I also made some with ice cube trays and popped a little sugar heart (The type that go on cupcakes) into the base before i pressed the sugar in and these are just as pretty in my opinion and i thought a lot of you will have an ice cube tray laying about.
As an intelligent and sassy New Yorker, Skylar Thornton doesn’t believe in the supernatural until she moves into Summerwind Mansion and begins having nightmares about a young woman murdered in the house. She suspects there’s something strange about this place and it’s not just the bad dreams.
This is a single vineyard plot from the Grand Cru Brand, from where legend has it a dragon set off to fight the sun – he lost. The vines are 60 year old, giving great depth. The heat of this site really shows with cooked lemon, lemon curd notes and a rich citrus twist to the mineral finish – 90 points.
If you have asked yourself similar questions keep reading. I think you will find this inspiring, like I did. What if we lived life like Brooke Bronkowski?
The sheer ignorance “plea” concocted by the AG on behalf of the two reporters is really an insult to the intelligence of the public. This is reinforced by the fact that the magazine which they are working for, Al-Islam, is a monthly magazine published by Utusan Karya Sdn Bhd, a subsidiary of Utusan Group (which is owned by Umno) and which publishes the Utusan Malaysia (UM).
I reached into my pocket and pulled out two dimes and a nickel and handed them each a coin and gestured to the fountain. They went through a quick array of emotion; surprise, honor and humbleness, thankfulness, and then it gave way to serious contemplative prayer. Amidst bowing lowly, smiling and thanking me, they lined up shoulder to shoulder, all three folded their hands; coins in palm, prayed earnestly and one by one opened their eyes and tossed their coins into the fountain.
For those of you ladies who like to collect those vintage food tins to display in your kitchen, here is something for the bathroom. It is a Cotton Picker Cotton dispenser tin in beautiful pink. Click the image to go...
The more I tried to condense this post the more it grew -
I am working to double check my inventory and slash the prices on my current stock items. I will leave the blog open, and I will still answer questions and comments as they arise. If you have been a customer of Doable Diapers and you need help with anything, don’t hesitate to ask. I’m still a cloth diapering mommy!
Usually I adjust the contrast too, so it looks more like the
If you think I am kidding about how quickly all of this happens, well, first off, Fuck You, because I don't lie! And second, here's the actual relevant unedited episode itself:
Short term traders will trade what the market gives them. Swing traders and certainly investors need a clearer view of things… right now, the market waters are pretty murky and probably will continue until May 6th with the French AND Greek elections. Let’s not forget, these are elections… politicians don’t get elected by taking things away from voters but quite the opposite. Not only that, if somehow the markets conclude that these changes (assuming they do change) would be a plus for growth in Greece and France, well, the market should ________ (Fill in the blank because the market is not rationale).
"Remember that case of nasty chicken bones we got last Wednesday? Maybe there's an epedemic of bad stocks sweeping the city..."
Yes, 30 billion. With a capital "B".
For instance he always wanted his own Garden Centre - 20 years ago (even 5 years ago) this seemed an impossible dream and yet nearly 3 years ago, against the odds, Kingdom Vegetal opened it's gates for the first time!
She is inspired by juicy, jewel-tones, rusty-crusty, peeling, earth-covered... things. Magic, mystery, bits, pieces, and weird little creatures. If it sits still, she'll paint it. Sandy lives with her two kids (Alex and Lilah) and her cat, Lilo, in their colorful, mixed-media house in New Hampshire.
I soaked up their feedback and poured it back into my writing, making it more interesting, using words and phrases they themselves used, and letting them help me solve problems with the plot and logic. I was not insulted when they yelled at me for a choice I made—these were my characters, my settings, my stories, and I could do what I wanted with them. At times, I wondered if my writing was actually any good, but I figured that my friends would lose their desire to read my stories every week if they were lacking. Moreover, I saw the amount of editing done with my friends’ works and felt better about my own. I can honestly say I never sacrificed anything to fit the desires of my friends; if they wanted to stop reading, then they would. My writing only ever got stronger.
Meanwhile beat the eggs and the cream
Le Spa Nordik in Cantley, Quebec. I’m anxious to check it out but honestly am not feeling too hot in a bathing suit these days, so I’m saving it until the effects of Christmas wear off. Derek, being a typical man, told me that I was stupid but that I looked awesome, and then agreed to let me choose something else.
Let’s move to my personal favorite: the unforgiveable steak & ketchup eater. If you order a filet mignon, that darling of steaks, its juices oozing pink and brown across your plate, and then squirt a bloody lycopene and high fructose corn syrup goo on it, we will demean you in our minds and in our kitchen. You have just obliterated your filet’s rich warm taste and buttery texture beneath sugary processed slop. Pay attention, because this is the exact moment in time when your server will give you a pitying look across the dining room and disappear through a door. If your suspicion is that he is relaying your mignon faux pas to the entire staff, your suspicion is correct. Let’s take a walk through that swinging door and into the other universe of the restaurant. The chefs are brandishing knives right now at the thought of your flagrant degradation, the hostess is giggling behind her palm at the vile oaths they hurl at you, and the server is rolling his eyes and thinking there’s no tip in the world big enough to make his job worthwhile. The dishwasher is sighing, thinking of how he would’ve treasured the steak bite by bite, or perhaps sold it to the delivery guy for some smack, and the busboy? Oh, the busboy is just wondering if there’s going to be any leftovers from the buffet next door, don’t worry about him.
Speaking of coconuts, the provisions were so bad on the boat that we were forced to make glassware out of coconuts:
In a most common fashion, a large number of Pakistani troops, with their armoured vehicles, lay siege to the area from where they want to drive out the Baloch, bomb the area for hours, torch houses and harass and torture women, children and aged people, loot valuables and livestock and sometimes burn the livestock and people alive, the press release also read.
I love how He gives me reasons every day to keep looking up; to keep trusting Him; and to keep Believing Him for the impossible. I'm so glad He thinks I'm worth it. He thinks we're worth it.
Thank you for all you kind and loving comments, I appreciate all of you, and just don't go overboard trying to please someone with "unrealistic" spending. You can make a person so happy, just by making something by hand, like crafting, baking a special treat, give a nice picture frame with a favorite photo of yourself or them; any of these gifts cost so little, yet means so much to the recipient you are giving it to!
an opal glowing on dark cloth.
2) Who approved it and when? Was it when Muhyiddin was Agriculture Minister?
Combine all ingredients and chill about 2 hours. Serve with bagel or pita chips. I also like serving with bagels cut into 1 inch pieces. This is the classic recipe from Knorr, but I lightened it a bit. The cayenne adds a little extra zip.
Birth Stats
Once out of school, Vacher joined the military where he was known as a loner, and was thought to be "brutally severe" with new recruits, in part due to his violent temper. Vacher's murderous rage first became known to the authorities in 1893 when he shot the object of his affection, a young maidservant named Louise Barrant, four times because she laughed at him when he proposed marriage. After attempting to murder her because she did not return his affections, Joseph Vacher turned the gun on himself, attempting suicide by shooting himself in the head. Miraculously, both Louise and Joseph survived their injuries. Vacher was left permanently scarred, and partially paralyzed on one side of his face. A bullet remained lodged in his skull, and he may have suffered some brain damage as a result of his suicide attempt. After this incident, Joseph was sent to Saint Robert Asylum in Dole, France - but he was released after one year with the doctors claiming that he had been "cured of his violent persecution mania". The New York Times reported that the physicians actually released him because, "they were afraid of an outcry in the press against the arbitrary confinement of a citizen under the pretext that he was insane." The Times went on to say, "the physicians were well aware that he was not in a condition to be at large."
The room’s faces
Papers are from Kaiser Craft "Sweet Nothings and the telephone embellie is from My Minds Eye Stella Rose.
I don't want to leave the impression that we have a perfect life or that I don't have problems. Living in a house with 11 flawed people has its challenges. I make constant mistakes and have a meltdown occasionally. It is Christ that holds me together and teaches me what my priorities should be. I want to encourage you that it is possible to have a happy, neat and godly home. Homeschooling, while it adds extra challenges to keeping a tidy home, also give opportunity to work together as a family. Putting God first, then family, then home keeps everything in the right
Williams & Williams Co. of Tulsa, Okla., conducted the auction on a sunny, windy day outside the trading post, which has been closed since Dec. 31. The number of bidders was not released.
½ cup whipped topping
Lorrie Moore (Anagrams, Self-Help or the one with "frog" in the title)
Now, Christ comes down to tear the envelop, throw it away and says I’m the LORD OF SABBATH (rest). Meaning we no longer need a day to offer us with REST. He confirms this in Heb: 4.3…..where he chooses another day, saying TODAY IF YOU HEAR my voice harden not your heart to enter his REST. Meaning every day we need his REST.
You know, I really love exposing weak arguments. And a lot of the times, it’s too easy. Conservatives, as study’s show, are not really intellectually complicated and for the most part cannot handle nuanced style thinking.
Sources include:
This is the scale I will be using. I understand that the weight readings are not always super accurate. I’m just going to use it as a baseline and hope that it’s at least internally consistent. Hopefully weighing 3 times in a row and taking the average will smooth out the process.
For the small reasons listed above, some countries will have to do the rest of the world a solid and suffer with what appears to outsiders as a completely inconvenient and way of life.
Prose poetry and narrative poetry got me first. I started writing poetry in the 1980s and was encouraged by two great mentors and poets, Molly Peacock and Ellery Akers. My poetry was fairly narrative, and I had no idea that I was trying to write little stories. I found that out later. When I took a hard look at my poetry, it was flash.
Indeed, anyone — like me — who dared question the great British sell-off was instantly labelled a xenophobe, out of touch with the reality of the modern globalised economy.
5. Spoon in to a jar.
One day, however, my aunt – tired of all the noise around with four screaming kids – broke this religious routine and took me to her clinic in Quail Valley, Princeton, West Virginia as a punishment (I guess). It was there I ran into the mighty treasure-trove of knowledge hard-bound in leather. Britannica followed the Eureka I screamed out of joy.
‘The Romney campaign is telling reporters that its top operatives tried to keep Grenell from resigning. But the context is that anti-gay activists have been attacking Grenell for his homosexuality and Romney for appointing him from the day he announced the appointment. And the Romney campaign had been conspicuously silent in the face of those attacks’.
“Pakistan ISI Backs Taliban: Claims LSE Report by Matt Waldman“, posted by MJK at Pro Pakistan – Voice of the Green, 13 June 2010 — Note that they post a direct link to the report; none of the western news media exhibit such professionalism. And of course no rebuttals will appear in the western media (they serve to keep us ignorant).
One of the best ways for me to find peace if I really need it, is to go anywhere with water. The ocean is my best friend, but I’ll also settle for lakes or any other body of water. I like to be by myself, or with just one other person, perfectly silent, enjoying each other’s company and the beauty of nature.
Having to explain myself was nothing compared to the numerous setbacks I would experience during my inaugural show preparation. I severely injured my tailbone in a snowboarding wipeout at the end of January and was unable to train for over two weeks. Three weeks before the show there was a fire in my apartment which meant that training and my thesis were put on hold for days and even my diet took a hit as I was unable to prepare my meals.
are dressing too. I think it's very positive. It's seems
While we were traveling last month I managed to read a whole book. Not having a computer to work/play on meant I read before bed. That's an observation in it's self but what I am referring to is the price of the hardback I read - about $26! For a novel and not one destined to become a classic or a "keeper" for my own collection. A popular novelist and I have read a few of his/her books. They are enjoyable enough but not enough for me to pay $26 for....
So instead of attempting a half-arsed analysis, I’ll skip to the end – well, three games from the end: a typically scrappy, at times backs-to-the-wall, affair at home to Forest.
The balanced life.
Of course, there were times that I doubted I was doing the right thing. I spent all week reading God's Word and praying. I prayed that if He did not want me to go - that it would be impossible for me to go in one way or another.
When back measures 21 inches from hem line (20 inches from 1st row of 1st pattern) bind off 5 stitches each side and decrease 1 stitch each side every 2nd row 3 times.
I don’t think there is a single person out there who doesn’t remember exactly where they were/ what they were doing when they heard the unheard of and saw the unforeseen.
Then again, he will see her
Within 3 minutes of first booting up the touchpad lost all control of the pointer and had to be shut down and have a mouse attached. This it appears is an all too common problem with this model. Not to worry though, the alps touchpad driver was uninstalled and replaced with a generic driver from Microsoft update and functions perfectly. The Dell community forum is full of disgruntled owners with the same problem. Failing power supplies and keyboards also rank high on the list of faults with many owner very angry with Dell and its lack of response to these problems on the 1545 model.
The teacher ratings came out this week. It seems there are a lot of innacuracies. I imagine if an important report affected you they way these affect teachers who get unfavorable ratings, you would be upset. It seems that you don't care about that so much. Too bad.
UYQIR Blog (uyqirblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
There has been a lot of goodness over the last few days. I feel stuffed with gratitude and joy!
literally:
with sways of orchestral passion
Friends who have 'ruggedized' point and shoots that are good for 10' or 15' of depth did find they sometimes flooded when snorkeling just that much deeper. So beware if you use those types - they also seem to have a fairly high failure rate in consumer blogs.
-Cinnamon Oat pancakes and fruit smoothies
The papacy is by far the wealthiest institution on earth.
Squeeze those hops for all they’re worth and prepare to pucker up: Nugget Nectar Ale, will take hopheads to nirvana with a heady collection of Nugget, Warrior and Tomahawk hops. Starting with the same base ingredients of our flagship HopBack Amber Ale, Nugget Nectar intensifies the malt and hop flavors to create an explosive
Sahara Knax was involved in the original outbreak of mystical energy in the town of Indigo Springs and is now described as being "profoundly" contaminated, with birdlike characteristics including a beak, pinfeathers and growths on her back (which have been described by witnesses as "winglike.") Like other victims of the mystical outbreak, Knax is thought to be also suffering from delusions, and has convinced an unknown number of Americans that she may be a goddess, a living embodiment of the spirit of the Earth. Blog posts and online communities have variously hailed her as "the first prophet of the Millennium," "An Avenging Angel of the Ecological Movement," and an eco-terrorist. Her followers, some of whom refer to themselves as Alchemites, say that the working magic is a holy act, and is the key to reversing global climate change.
My manly man doesn't believe it can be a real meal without meat.
However, perhaps all is not lost. In March 2010 it was reported that an ‘education entrepreneur’ had bought the building and it was to become a campus after all.
How do you want this to end?
» 12/13 – Anaheim, CA @ Honda Center
I always find that when I use 6 x 6 papers, I am left with loads of strips as I tend to only use enough to cover a notecard. This way, you waste no paper at all. Better for the environment as well as saving money. Yay!
Hard-pushed employers and over-worked colleagues will be among those who agree with his analysis.
Access to computer with printer (optional)
“No. Not gonna finish vegetables. Don’t like ‘em.”
So, what do you think, is it horrible????? I can tell you that I learned a very important lesson, I AM SO DONE WITH MY RED HAIR!!! I hope yall have a great week, because I know I will since last week is now behind me!!!
Thanksgiving was as traditional as it gets, girls in the kitchen cooking all kinds of goodies while the boys played football outside. I made my cooking debut by creating a butternut squash bake, and it was AWESOME. I am definintely going to toot my own horn here, it is not often that I can produce something that people enjoy. I was so proud of myself. We had a great meal together as a "family". The next day we watched all the American football games that were played on Thanksgiving, while stuffing ourselves full of pizza, as if we were not full enough from the day before. Very memorable Thanksgiving for Alex and I.
Anthony Doerr, C. Max McGee, Elif Batuman, John Williams
Our barnyard geese are enraptured, as much as geese can be, with all the grass. If there’s a lovelier place to revel in spring than the Shenandoah Valley and the mountains, I don’t know it. Narnia, maybe.
The Last Thing On My Mind
5. Corn Puffs
“Eric management style is to let the team’s progress be reviewed by individuals the team respects. In most companies there exist a few individuals that are universally respected or at least more respected than everyone else.
Coming up with a structure seems to be the part which stumps many people. Having extensive financial and business expertise, or spending your life delving into specifics (like most researchers) may just lead you off-track, as you ignore the big picture and get distracted by the detail.
I'll replace the photo as soon as I make mine. Just wanted you to see it..
* Taxpayers abroad. U.S. citizens and resident aliens who live and work abroad, as well as members of the military on duty outside the U.S., have until June 15 to file and pay. However, interest is still due on any tax payment made after April 17.
Revealing an absurdity
“It is said that the present is pregnant with the future.” Voltaire
MAY 1 — The day was Saturday, 28 of April, 2012 and it was the day I had been waiting for, to be counted in as an obedient peace loving Malaysian. I had always believed in a fair and just government although it may sound silly to some. I don’t really care who run the government of the day. I am not involved in politics and was never a member of any political party since I believe power corrupts.
Well, that was definitely a challenge for me! And it took me longer to decide what to do than to actually make the card. I was going to make a fancy shaped card, since I almost always make the standard 6x6 size, but the stoooopid dies I have wouldn't cut through 2 layers of cardstock.
I was drawn particularly to a stand labeled Portobello Crêpes (one of many, I later discovered). After seeing nutella & banana on the menu, my breakfast decision was finalized; I dished out £4 (worth it) and proceeded to watch the crêpe form before me.
Roy Hobbs - New York Knights
9) What's a TV show you're embarrassed to admit you watch?
Mile 13: I swear that mile 13 was the longest mile I have ever run in my entire life. We just kept shuffling and shuffling. I tried not to walk but I had to. It was along some highway and we could see the stadium but were not getting any closer. Near tears.
I’m working on it all though. Taking each day as its own entity. Trying hard not to look into the future and become overwhelmed. Because I need to maintain. I need to keep it together. It’s on its way back around for me, I can feel it, but I need to be patient and stay strong.
The first thing I had to do was find some hot pink and scored when I found this fab damask pink and black paper lurking in my paper box. I have no idea where I found it, but it's by 'Glitz' and called 'Hot Mama Brocade'. I set to work --- I had 1 1/2 hrs! I started with a base of white, layered with black, pink and the brocade paper. I love Just Rite Stampers for this sort of thing, it personalises and can become the focal point of a card. I used the Small Letter Set to create the outer sentiment and the Special Occasions Font for the '50'. It was cut out with my circle nestabilities (the 50 was punched with a 1 1/4in punch and popped up). I used the next size up to cut a pink layer that I embossed with 'Textile' EF. Finally I mounted it all on the black layer that has been cut using the Label 3 nestabilities. Add a wide sheer ribbon and lots of pink bling on the centre piece and corners and hey presto, one super fast card!!! I got the card to her just in time.....and she said it would be perfect for her hot pink loving friend! Whew!!
To write criticism about SF is almost always to be stuck in content, not form. (We could, and perhaps should, argue about the soft borders between the two terms, the limits of the terms, the fact that content and form don't really exist outside of the words of the text, what that binary hides, etc. — but at the risk of inaccuracy, let's save such an argument for another time.)
Although many ready-made masks are now offered on the market, you really can create your own mask with ease. In addition to cheap, nutritious, natural ingredients are used also does not have harmful effects to the skin.
I 100% applaud the creativity and hard work of all the Aveda students! Bravo!
I really wanted to capture the freshness of the garden so I added some real foliage!! I have been pressing some flowers recently but they're not ready yet so I bought some vacuum packed bags of pressed flowers and foliage. They are pretty delicate so it's best to use a tweezers when handling them. I just added them to my card with some tiny dots of an acid free glue. The frame I made using Spellbinders Labels 18 and Classic Ovals large. The background is embossed using the woodgrain folder.
Here it is!—His frantic newspaper! Tip-top!
I grew up at the foot of a chain of mountains. As a teenager, I dreamed only about the city, about leaving. These mountains were symbols of boredom. It took me time to learn to know them, to appreciate them. The fascination Phil Elverum has for his mountain, Mt. Erie, has probably guided me to them. These days, I always miss those “summits” when I’m away for too long.
235210 Painting & wall covering contractors
Dunkin' Donuts introduced DDSMART last summer. This is a line of better-for-you menu items. Options include the new Egg White Flatbread sandwiches, Latte Lite, a reduced fat blueberry muffin and others. On January 26 and 27, Dunkin' Donuts is virtually opening the doors to its kitchens for the first time. Dunkin's culinary experts will participate in a special Facebook event to answer any questions about DDSMART, listen to suggestions for other options that could be added to the DDSMART menu, and share thoughts on how to maintain a healthy lifestyle no matter how busy life gets. You can join in the conversation January 26 & 27th!
This morning I ventured out into the overcast and chilly weather to experiment with a few lenses: 40mm, 50mm, 105mm. No zooms. I had to use a zoom at the bodybuilding show, but I don’t really like them. There’s just something about moving that feels more natural to me.
RR—I think this qualitative reality—you could say that the psychic part is like a qualitative reality that’s not reducible to a quantitative system, and that’s part of the value of it, that’s part of what makes us human beings is that we can’t be reduced to a system, to a definition, to a formula. And that’s exactly why our culture doesn’t like this stuff, because we want everything reduced and controlled. And we want Nature reduced to something as consumable, and there’s more to it than that. I know that sounds vague, but I don’t really know what to say about it.
18. volcano- beck
But we do always aim to walk, run, explore, entertain, eat good food, laugh heaps and take the joy that is available.
Comparatively, Nigerian security agencies have busted more terrorist cells, explosive factories and training camps than Indonesia; taken out more terrorists than the Detachment 88; and thwarted more terroristplots than Indonesian agencies.
A few drops of green food coloring
These stories sound horrific, because they are. You may have already heard one or two of these stories and thought to yourself, “Oh, goodness, if I had been there, I would have helped them! People are just sick these days!”
Many times we haven’t done enough front-end homework as leaders, so we aren’t prepared to place people where they can grow and can blossom.
Congratulations, ladies! Please grab your Golden Egg badge and display it proudly on your blog! We'd love it if you could link it back to our challenge too.
It is now clear that this acknowledgment, which was ignored in media coverage of the briefing, was a reference to ISI's providing the CIA with both the cell phone number of Arshad Khan and the fact that it belonged to the owner of the compound in Abbottabad. The unnamed official was confirming indirectly that until ISI had given it that information, the CIA had not focused on the Abbottabad compound as the likely location of bin Laden's courier, or, therefore, of bin Laden himself.
First, we've decided to have a very intimate celebration (35-40 guests) in a town we still have yet to visit. To briefly explain, Jeff just recently accepted a job along the Mississippi Gulf Coast and we'll be relocating there in mid-April and planning a local wedding for October.
recycling one of my favourite lookbook videos, because it's finally warm here! just in time for summer...
Happy New Year to all of you!
A group of scientists from Harvard Medical School (Johnson et al., 2004) claims to have “established the existence of proliferative germ cells that sustain oocyte and follicle production in the postnatal mammalian ovary”
When the letter Q came around I said "UGH!!!!!!What to write what to write".
That's the whole point though. It's not for everyone one. It's not the only way to parent. It might not even be the right way to parent, but it's her decision. Yes, she did go on the cover of the magazine to showcase it, which is an issue I'll talk about in a minute, but this parenting style is her choice, because the boy is her son, and if she screws it up? Well that's her problem too.
Was made perfect and became our source of salvation.
Interestingly, when it comes to feast days, he shares the same ones as James the Less, son of Alphaeus in the Anglican (May 1) and Catholic (May 3) Churches. It is only in the Eastern Orthodox Church where the dates differ: December 26 (James the Just) and October 9 (James the Less, son of Alphaeus).
Once the file has been downloaded ,you can open the file from the history section of the app ,by taping any item.
The early Ben Hollioake looked to have the same skill, but cricket was robbed of the chance to see how he would use it.
Blake was literally the perfect guy for Allie. He understood that she needed to heal, though he didn't know how much, and he never stopped trying. After some of the stunts Allie pulled, I'm not sure I would have kept trying to be her friend but he was unrelentless. Blake's reputation as a bad boy made him appealing but his soft edges and kindness made him irresistible. I loved their relationship because I believed in it. Their attraction was undeniable but the fact that they took their time and started to realize how wonderful the other was made watching them fall in love addictive. Blake was pretty much the perfect opposite of Trip and I liked watching him win everyone over despite his reputation.
2. How did you tell Jeff about the pregnancy? After sanitizing my little stick, I wrapped it in a box and put it in his Easter basket. He knew though because I was very anxious for him to open it! :)
“I think my motto in this whole experience is that sports is something you can do in hijab, and you shouldn’t let your faith compromise how athletically gifted you become,” Muhammad told HuffPost blogger Laura Tillman.
So, my dear Overwhelmingly Abundant Yet Remarkable Idiots, I warn thee. I will go all Shawshank on ‘dat ass. I mean it. Don’t make me teach you a lesson.
Fermentables
I have always told my kids that old adage. "You can catch more bees with honey than with vinegar." Too bad for those stupid ole vinegary people out there.
did it better than Faerie O’ Thief could ever do!
Chop broccoli and store in zipper bag.
# 133...Chris Olsen
3. Cardamom powder, ¼ teaspoon.
With that story all wrapped up and the boys off the hook with crimes and wrong relationships, Kya Super Kool Hai Hum opens a new bag of worms. This sequel takes our boys on a road trip to Goa and along the way the situations are ridiculous. Again, mistaken identities come into play and the guys can’t seem to get a break. The film’s actresses are Sarah Jane Dias and Neha Sharma.
So here I sit, staring at the screen. Typing a few sentences. Stopping and biting a cuticle. Typing a few words. Stopping and picking at a scab.. Thinking of all those other blog writers who are so much better than I and really have something to say and really have real-life problems and are still getting on with life. Staring at the screen.
Information on the company is fairly scarce online, but I came across this small article on Massage Magazine's website, about the history of Pompeian massage cream which has a little of the company's history. Though much of the available information relates to the brand's Canadian roots, it was in fact an international company, with its British headquarters in Leeds.
Your doctor may give you advice about exercise and diet. For example, your doctor may tell you how much calcium you need to prevent bone problems, or he or she may talk to you about taking folic acid before you get pregnant. Your doctor may also give you advice about alcohol and drug use and sexually transmitted infections, as well as lowering the fat and cholesterol in your diet. Your doctor may also talk to you about injury prevention practices, such as using seat belts and having smoke detectors in your home.
I speak fluent sarcasm. Vanity is my favorite sin. I love myself the most.
no swagger. in the open spaces
There’s the horse!
However, there have also been some very sinister noises amongst the squeaking, baying and clucking of the usual suspects. Amnesty International for one have declared that the referendum result is illegal and will have to be overturned either by the Swiss Supreme court or by the European Court of Human Rights . Meanwhile voices from within that bastion of ethical democracy the United Nations, have been making similar statements, whilst another paragon of Human rights, Turkey, has been calling on the Swiss government to “correct” the result.
Embrace your inner bi-polarity. Embrace contradiction as a part of the philosophy.
Tomorrow is Friday! I can't wait! I'm so ready for the week to be over. I wish the work week was 2 days and the weekend was 5. I have so many thoughts; they may be scattered all over the place, so hold on!
The gate against the bin – again.
The bowling night is taking a bad turn, starting with Tom injuring his fingers. Despite Leslie being an exceptionally good bowler, she loses the game on purpose to make Derek like her and asks if she can count on his vote when election time comes around. You can imagine her surprise when he simply says, “No.” He says he just doesn’t like her and Leslie sees red, calling him a crappy bowler and demands a rematch, which he angrily accepts. She ends up winning and Derek, who is fairly drunk by this time, says he’s still not voting for her and calls her a bitch in front of everyone. Ben overhears this and immediately jumps into protective boyfriend mode, asking Derek what he said. Derek repeats it and Ben punches him square in the face, surprising even himself. Unfortunately, it’s all caught on film and an officer says Derek is considering pressing charges as Ben ices his hand.
Combine this with the ability to literally move the console around in the air in order to change your in-game view, and you’ve got a device that will respond to the smallest twitch of your thinnest muscle fibres.
But alas, I do TRY. Actually one of my New Year’s Resolutions was to make at least 1 new recipe a week. While I haven’t really stuck to that -or lets be real, any- resolution all that much, every once in a while I will try something new.
Favorite Episode: 7
Cains from Liverpool is certaily local, Holt's from Manchester and Beartown from Congleton is pushing it a bit - at least Beartown is Cheshire, as historically is Bromborough. But hang on! Lancaster Brewery beers classed as local to Wirral? It's 60 miles away by the shortest route and 85 miles along the M6 which is the route most people would take.
it will not be visible.
I share with you.
I'm devoting the entire day tomorrow to the craft room and getting caught up on some much needed cards to share and some DT cards. The beautiful weather, me thinks, has given me Spring Fever and I have just been outside puttering around the yard and working on the patio along with some much needed cleaning.
From the very first episode, I hoped that she and "Nick" would someday get together (anyone else with me?!), and it seems a bit obvious that that's where the show will go. Schmidt has turned out to be a hilarious character, too! So, you can imagine when I realized that he had a guest spot on my favorite show, Gilmore Girls!!!
8) Why Do Only Women Whine? By stating that determined women are “whiners” their opinions instantly lose credibility in a distinctly sexist way.
Is it as simple as people forgetting to leave the software running in order to accept a call? Or, that your PC isn’t always on your person? Does leaving a VoIP app running in the background on your phone draw too much power? These examples are certainly factors, but the primary reason that VoIP hasn’t taken over is a simple lack of ubiquity. It is likely that the majority of the people that you know carry a mobile phone. You know that when you dial their number they will answer the call, or at least be left with a timely notification of your attempt. No matter the handset manufacturer or plan provider, every single person with a phone number is connected to the same network of networks as everybody else. In 2011, The International Telecommunication Union reported almost 6 billion active mobile-cellular subscriptions worldwide. VoIP services on the other hand, while widely used, are only sporadically populated: earlier this month (April 2012) Skype celebrated a new record of 40 million concurrent users. A massive achievement, but one that pales in comparison.
You sleep on your side now. Maybe you've done it for awhile, but I've never dared check on you much while you're sleeping in fear that I'd wake you up (you are STILL the lightest sleeper on the planet). But lately I've been checking the temperature in your room before I go to bed and you're on your side all cuddled up to your little blanket. I find myself just staring at you for minutes at a time. I can't get enough.
We are taken back to the past and while the younger one gets all the attention as they ready her for the competition, the older one seethes in rage. One day, as she presses her younger sister’s skirt with a medieval iron, she accidentally-on-purpose scars her face. It might technically be an accident but I think there was some intent there. Anyway, the crown prince can’t marry an ugly girl so the older sister takes her place and gets chosen as the bride.
Iron Stylus: New animations. Particles. A voice set. You know, what we normally do.
even in saying all of these things, i am a very happy person. I am going through a time in my life where i am incredibly thankful for the love and life that i have. and yep, i'm about to say it, i am SO unbelievably blessed!! i have a great family that i am so close to and a fiance that is by my side no matter what. everyday i get more and more excited for my future and what it has to bring for me.
Today, I had a girl ask me what a feather bed was. We are the same age. Does it seem like we are missing some vital piece of nostalgic history here? I used to fight with my siblings over who got to take a nap on the feather bed.
Disappear would be released on INXS 1990 “X” album. Def Leppard would later release their “X” album in 2002.
To a day when the curtains draw back to reveal
“We cannot address our obesity overweight problem without addressing the fact that we spend nearly all of our time on the couch and in the car,” he declared. “That is what we have to address and the only way we can address that is by changing the way we build our cities.”
As some of you had commented via email, we may have had similar struggles with weight, or you may be on your own journey to health with the new year (congrats if you are). I hope to provide you with some of the best resources I've found and answer any questions you may have. I will get more in depth after the detox is over and I can truly introduce you to this incredible lifestyle that is changing my life.
It makes complete sense that a studio should give Rowan & Martin a G-rated vehicle in which they star as fast-talking porno film producers who get evicted from their NYC studio and have to relocate to a Collinwood type mansion to solve a who-dun-it in upstate N.Y....Flushing to be exact. What we have here is an farcical and loving homage to the Abbott & Costello formulation. Personally, I find The Maltese Bippy to be very funny. There are some wonderful bits sprinkled throughout the film which include a breaking of the fourth wall opening sequence, a weird Dick Martin as werewolf riding a bicycle through town that's reminiscent of Paul Newman and Robert Redford in Butch Cassidy And The Sundance Kid, some weird animation, and a very humorous Laugh-In style ending -- trap door and all, and it has a big cast that will make you beg for more. Check it Out.
“The kingdom of God is inside YOU, and all around YOU”
You have got to remember, during the Cold War they actually had this anti-Communism excuse.
I thought: "WTF?" But then, reconsidered that thought: "They look so adorable!"
This one is more of an easy, handywoman-type list. With yours truly as the handywoman of course. ;) We are hoping to entertain quite a bit this summer – and it’s about time. We didn’t do much party-wise last summer because of all the work we had done outside. Then at the end of the summer we had the water issues in the kitchen, and the house wasn’t put back together till late October.
(c) No decision yet about the First Tier Tribunal.
To think Hannah ever believed that Americans differed from Brits mainly in pronunciation, sophistication and dentistry. That’s been the understatement of a lifetime.
I download Diptic and start playing with collages. Also have a look at Picnik. It's so time consuming. It's something I really want to learn. Will I ever find the time? Advice most welcome.
Just a word to indie sellers, if you're ill or have some kind of problem then announce it. Most people are going to be fine to wait for their stuff if they know you're having a hard time, or at least will want to know what's going on. Just disappearing without any explanation is frustrating and suspicious. Perhaps give someone you trust the log in to your facebook account or similar so if any emergency happens they can take care of the business.
We're going to the bra shop
I can't say I've ever been a huge fan of these sorts of drinks, and I've expressed my opinion about them in this very space before. But I do understand that people enjoy sugary alcoholic drinks, like ready-made margaritas or "hard" lemonade. My question is: why the energy boost? If you need a pick-me-up, drink some coffee, or better yet, take a nap. And if that's the case, should you really be consuming a lot of alcohol?
What ever happened, for instance, to hymns like the lovely “O Sanctissima”?
finished the path and the painting
Pour batter into prepared pans; sharply tap pans once on counter to remove air bubbles. Bake at 350° for 32 minutes or until a wooden pick inserted in center comes out clean. Cool in pans 10 minutes on a wire rack; remove from pans. Cool completely on wire rack; remove wax paper from cake layers.
Hay on Wye is literally a hop, skip and a jump over the border, and despite getting stuck behind every slow driver in Worcestershire, Warwickshire and Herefordshire, it was worth the trip. This town is rammed full of bookshops – everywhere you turn there is another amazing shop selling beautiful second hand books, on every conceivable subject.
Irving WL, James DK, Stephenson T, et al. Influenza virus infection in the second and third trimesters of pregnancy: a clinical and seroepidemiological study. BJOG 2000; 07: 1282-1289.
With greenish color filters and a stunning eclipse blazing in the sky, this teaser is nothing short of artistic and breathtaking. A piano melody titled “Reflection I”, performed by Song Kwang Sik gives the release an austere touch.
The prequel for this episode was of Mr Snow with his werewolf ally Milo discussing Annie. I have a feeling we’re going to be seeing Milo again next series. Oh and we got a flash forward to 2022 where an 11 year old Eve escaped from Snow.
It is with a heavy heart and unequivocal tone that I say 2012 has been an absolutely wretched year for me.
And the best part? I actually like the two cards I created!
Drexel librarians assessed first year design projects for information literacy outcomes. Course sequence: ENGR 101-103 includes projects on reverse engineering (they use a $2 camera which they take apart then put back together & use CAD), green house design, and nanoenlightenment (simulating a nanorobot). In ENG103 student teams design anything but need to start with research. Nine hundred students take course. Students need to find books, articles, technical handbooks, patents, and how to cite information. Self-guided tutorials seem to be included in the research education.
Get yourself some shells, a box and a glue- gun and you're ready to roll-
At first they were a more or less conventional sister act. (One of their hits was the classic “Side by Side”, perhaps the ultimate sister act song). Starting out in 1916 they did a yodeling act and were discovered by Gus Edwards. In 1917 they played the Fifth Avenue Theatre. From the start, Rosetta was the comedian, Vivian, the soubrette. In 1922, they played the Palace with an act called “’s that alright”.
Young adult author Shelley Coriell writes stories about teens on the edge of love, life-changing moments, and a little bit of crazy. Her debut novel, Welcome, Caller, This is Chloe, releases May 1, 2012 from Amulet Books/Abrams. A six-time Romance Writers of America Golden Heart finalist, Shelley lives in Arizona with her family and the world’s neediest rescue Weimaraner. When she’s not writing, she bakes high-calorie, high-fat desserts and gives speeches about
Can be found everywhere in the world. Range in height, weight, "smartness," and dependability. This variety tends to spend time reliving memories and drinking fermented drinks while watching other Homo sapiens tackle each other. Give them food and a nice Homo sapien var. Wife and they will thrive. They are a long-lived variety as long as they are healthy and don't upset their Wife.
Are these protestors denying the existence of these realities and the interlinked need for changes? How many of them even bothered read the LLRC, or even this resolution they are so opposed to?
“We’re going live now, keep the camera on the victims… closer! I want to see and SMELL some fear. Right, interview the cultists afterwards, we can work a weekly series out of this.”
Built as a bonded warehouse for the company Sandyford Brewery, Deuchar House is constructed from sandstone ashlar and follows the curve of Sandyford Road.
Is it like pounds of pressure? Like kilowatts? How do we get to where Jude is in amazement?
and then the custard fucking curdles and
The Dolce&Gabbana Animalier Bike is for ladies only and was born of Domenico Dolce and Stefano Gabbana’s passion for the athletic and healthy lifestyle.
If my brain tries to supply missing words this can be disconcerting for me and the person I am talking to because I am in fact free-associating or projecting only what it is I think they have said. This is a kind of surrealist computer program that converts speech into Monty Python sketches. The nearest most people get to this is the humble pun. My theory is that men find puns funnier than women because men’s language cognition tends to be more goal-directed, less emotionally convergent, so the pun hijacks the meaning (the goal) to a new absurd and remote place. Some men enjoy the affective disconnect of puns and absurdity generally because they are a holiday from empathy. Maybe it helps (?) that men’s hearing tends to be less responsive to the higher frequency ranges of the voices of women and children. But a joke should be like sex, something for two people both to enjoy – and the distortion of what somebody says usually only makes one person laugh. Even though human communication is often based on repetition/mirroring or regular blips of reassurance (someone listening on the phone: ‘No … yes … I see … mm …’), I don’t like to repeat back to people what I heard because if I get it wrong – my reason for checking – they might think I am taking the mickey.
This little fact set in motion the events that would lead to the perfect execution of our wicked plan.
Here are a few of the shots taken by Nancy.
So, I read up on space for spine, bleed areas, etc and worked out the dimensions for the POD cover. The best instructions are at Createspace.
“The true voyage of discovery does not consist of searching for new landscapes but of having a new pair of eyes.” Marcel Proust
This is a special one, since it’s not so much an impulse buy as an impulse sell (much like the 'cash for gold'). What you are selling, of course, is dignity and potentially your overall well-being. A respected clinical trial place might not be so bad, and you might only end up with the more traditional diarrhea side-effect, but do you really want to even risk having a story that ends with “and that’s the story of my exploding left testicle”? And you really don’t want to know what non-traditional diarrhea looks like.
The more objective you become, the clearer your path to accessing your intuition. Being objective means being less biased in the way you approach life and its challenges.
My brother appeared at 5pm and stayed for dinner.
Well, yesterday she flew through her eye exam, doing things she hadn't done before. You see before she couldn't see in 3D. Yesterday though, no problem. Before her eyes were crossed. Not yesterday, not.at.ALL. And before her vision was 20/40. Yesterday she tested at 20/25. Wow! What a difference a few months make!
SERVING: The cookies can be eaten when they are warm or at room temperature — I prefer them at room temperature, when the textural difference between the crumbly cookie and the chocolate bits is greatest — and are best suited to cold milk or hot coffee.
I love that my kids each have a
For dinner last night I made a beautiful Minestrone Soup-
Indians love cows because they share with us, the milk, that they give their own calves. So they are like our mothers. Even today many Indian refer to cows as Gomata (cow – mother).
Pentecost- Bible Story Wheel (Bible Wheels to Make and Enjoy by Carmen Sorvillo, page 63 & 64.)
(the below story is shared with permission from the adoptive family)
As I was writing this, I started talking to Ted about it again and the tears came, streaming down my face and if I had let it happen, I would have been sobbing. We ended up standing in the living room hugging for a few minutes.
The four year old was using the toilet so the two year old, who needed to go, just went ahead and dropped a deuce on the floor. (That is slang for number two or going poop. I know. Me so hip.) The two year old was doing some yoga pose in front of her pile and the four year old was really quite amused.
I still love this chair, and I'm not getting rid of it, but something better suited for us came my way. Jordan and I both wanted something with a higher back, that you could actually lean up against, and sit in comfortably. I went back and forth with lots of options, but I couldn't decide what exactly I wanted. Standard wingback chairs were too feminine and formal to me (though I do love them, in the right space), and the rest of the ones that I seemed to find were just slipper chairs, similar to what we already had.
to the shaken and shackled psyche
So when some driver swerves out in front of me without looking; or people stop to chat in the supermarket and form an accidental barricade with their trolleys; or politicians play silly games with people’s lives; I don’t get upset. I don’t expect anything different. Accept it and feel the peace.
Happy Furry Friday everyone!
Earlier today, a colleague and I were discussing the reasons why some workers just seem unable to perform well in their roles. Now, I've been in HR for some time and I can tell you that most leaders truly care about the reasons why people do or do not perform up to standards. But as many times as I have had this conversation, it usually ends up with us talking about things like personal responsibility, accountability, and a basic understanding of the relationship between actions - or inactions - and consequences. Really, it's just basic human behavior, and 15 years in HR qualifies me to play pop psychologist now and again, apparently.
We jumped.
Gucci Pout Homme
Thursday night he had a horrible episode that was either a stroke or a seizure. He collapsed and we thought then we might lose him. Both Mrs. ZZUB and I got on the floor with him, stroking his head, rubbing his belly, talking to him. After awhile, he seemed ok. Not fully himself, but not in any pain or threat of harm. He was mostly ok on Friday and again Saturday morning. Until his body gave out on him.
Each and every time, I wanted to die, and was disappointed when I hadn’t. The efforts of others to save my life were lost on me; I just wanted out. The last time I considered suicide, I found myself running out of the house in the middle of the night, into a storm. My mother and I had been arguing about the amount of control she has over my life, as usual, and I suddenly just couldn’t take it any more. For a few minutes, the idea of walking into the sea crossed my mind. I even set off along the embankment, planning on getting to the sea wall and letting the tide pull me away. The urge was addictive, and I couldn’t think of anything else but ending my life. The ability to see how my death would hurt others was lost to me, and I still don’t quite know why I went back home after two hours. I stopped being angry, I think.
Adam Smith published “The Wealth of Nations” in 1776. This argued that private ownership of gold would inevitably cause wars and catastrophes, as people continued fighting over scarce resources.
For example, we all know people who hate Brussels sprouts. But the dislike is likely all about a sensitivity to bitterness caused by chemicals called glucosinolates. To counter this, the trick is to break up the center of the sprouts by cutting them in half and then, to leach out the chemicals, to cook them in a lot of well-salted water. Forget steaming, forget roasting, the chemicals must be drawn out of the core. A great source of chemistry lessons like this is On Food and Cooking: The Science and Lore of the Kitchen by Harold McGee who also writes a blog called Curious Cook.
She’s been on a blog tour (for details Jessie's place) so rather than ask typical writing questions (that you’ll find anywhere else) we are getting personal.
The Museum of Free Derry in the Bogside neighborhood
Q What is the BSA Hercules India Cyclothon Hyderabad 2010?
“This Jesus hath God raised up, whereof we are all witnesses. . . . Therefore let all the house of Israel know assuredly, that God hath made that same Jesus, whom ye have crucified, both Lord and Christ” (Acts 2:32, 36).
The cop said Boggess had to hold onto the wall to take off her clothes because she could not maintain her balance.
I'm writing this on Thursday, I am still waiting for the key's to the new store, I could be rushed off my feet by Sunday. I am sitting pondering why solicitors make such a meal of everything, talk in there own language so that you are incapable of working it out for yourself.
Another strong run and I am very happy to not be running a half marathon next week end! I am still overwhelmed when I think about the fact that my "new" pace really is consistent and a sub 2:00 half marathon is within reach.
[51] Charles Bigg, A Critiical and Exegetical Commentary on the Epistles of St. Peter and St. Jude, (New York: Charles Scribner’s Sons, 1901), 199-210.
But then the fool wants to reform an unreformable system. That is the ultimate betrayal.
but still it wasn’t over for him
The best part of this holiday is seeing all the ingenious traps the kids come up with. This year they had an indoor and an outdoor one, just to cover all their bases. Unfortunately those sneaky little leprechauns escaped, right after tying all of our shoes out the windows. . .
I don't know about all of you , but this week has been BUSY and the time seems to be flying by. I planned to get this post out yesterday, but I just couldn't find enough time. I know Boo-Hoo for me right?? I am actually not complaining, but I do like to have some down time here and there. Nope...not this week.
A meal to look forward to, cooked by my lovely partner on Thursday night with a choice of what I can have. I consider myself so lucky right now.
in rubber stamping right now.
The only me-time is at night after clearing the toys and cleaning the mess etc. Recently I have also started ghostwriting. Don't pay much but it's kinda fun and I do get to learn quite a lot. It's just that I have to put in much time to do the researches. So like they say, 24 hours is not enough! :-)
I have to confess to being even worse with historical fiction. If I find an unintended anachronism or sloppy factual inaccuracies, I will not finish the book. Partly because I consider it to be 'my' genre, I don't like people playing fast and loose. I don't like history being used as a mere backdrop for adventures that involve lots of galloping about and where boys fight and girls flounce. I don't like books that deal in ill considered cliche or unquestioning nostalgia. I want a book that uses the freedom that writing fiction gives to look at history from a different angle, to tell me something I don't know, or makes me look at something familiar in a new way. Knowledge has to be matched with thought and imagination. At the other end of the spectrum, I don't like authors who have obviously done a mass of research and are going to make sure we know it, putting all those hours in the library to good effect by stuffing the narrative with endless facts.
An update on the September Freeze Out.. I have been doing great on my Starbucks limit. I have improved on eating more lunches packed from home than going out to grab something fast and easy. Wait for this one.. wait .. wait .. This whole week we have eaten IN for dinner! That is huge for the Waltzes. By this point in the week we would typically have felt 'deserving' of a fun meal out. We have been able to put a little bit more money towards a few debts and the routine established is one that I feel we could maintain. One thing that would make this better for us is to plan out our week of dinners, grocery shop regularly (I'm thinking once a week) and get the debt monkey off our back. It is great seeing the numbers go down. I know I will be jumping for joy everywhere once my students loans are dunzo (remember that line from early Laguna Beach?).
There are tells we need to look out for. It'll be individual, but mine is when I take some school prep home and think of it as something I'd like to get my teeth into. That's when I know something's gone seriously wrong.
a black and white checked pumpkin would be fun, maybe next year?
Another kick-ass heroine in an indigenous Italian series is Licia Troisi's La Ragazza Draco (The dragon girl). Troisi, who is big in Europe but not yet published in the UK is the author of the million-selling Mondo Emerso (emerged world) trilogies, all published by Mondadori.
But in many sea floor, has found a number of large high buildings with exquisite
You see, I desperately wanted to keep some of the murkier corners of my house hidden from Miss. Perfect; until inspection next year, at the very least.
36. The Liarbirds-Allegedly (Restless Wind)
Worthy of a party.
Ridiculously-comical dancing: check
‘You alright? Ready to answer some questions?’
couldn’t bear his absence
I sprayed using my copic ABS, stitched around the outside and added some text.
Wegmans.
They are yummy hot from the oven, or baked ahead for a picnic.
The ribbon-hangy-thingy was the perfect solution, but I wasn't sure how I wanted to attach it to the wall. Last April I was in Arizona with some friends and we went to Hobby Lobby. (drool.........)
Sports Illustrated swimsuit viewerThe 2012 swimsuit issue of Sports Illustrated hits newsstands this week, but fans will be happy to know it’s been given an upgrade thanks to mobile technology.
You’re a gemstone, precious, all else surpassing,
I sat cross-legged and felt at one with the universe! (LOL) The thought exploded in my mind that everything was connected, everything was one, there was no separation, and that if everything in the universe was connected and one, then there was nothing to fear. I pondered this for a while and it made sense to me. I felt like I had just been given one of the secrets of the universe. Then, I suddenly heard a rattle sound coming from directly in front of me about 20 feet away. I opened my eyes and was startled and wondered what could be making that noise. I knew that rattlesnakes were common in these hills, but this was no rattlesnake. Then I heard the noise again, this time coming from the right of me, still out about 20 feet away. I thought, maybe someone was playing a trick on me, but I realized that there was no one out here, I was alone, and, besides, how could a person move noiselessly through the chaparral without me hearing them? I was getting sacred and wondered what was going on. Then I heard the noise, except this time it was directly behind me. Then, again in front, except this time it was closer. The noise grew louder and louder as it continued to circle me. I suddenly became very afraid and my mind raced back to the Carlos Castaneda books that talked of encounters with spirit beings similar to the one I was encountering now. Whatever it was circled again growing closer with each pass that it made. Then it was right in front of me. Now remember that at this point I was still sitting cross-legged on the ground. Something came at me and gently pushed me backward and held me there. If you were in the “lotus” position this is impossible to do as the weight of your upper body would tilt you, and you would fall over backward. This was not the case though. This demonic spirit, I call it that because that is what it was, held me there for a while and then slowly let me up. Once it did, I jumped to my feet and started slamming my open palm against my thigh. This was a technique that I had read about from Castaneda who used it when a spirit that he did not want to deal with would come to him. This action would apparently repel the spirit. Once I had done this, another thought came into my mind and it said that if I had opened myself up to the spirit it would have been able to take me out of my body and shown me the secrets of the universe.
John Crowder, the new comic book hero of mysticism
HOW: Donate relief goods: blankets, clothing, food, etc.
The registration desk in the morning isn't exactly thronging with eager congress-goers. Must have picked up their materials yesterday. At the Group Photo on the spacious front steps of the convention center there's room for a serious convention, but only 60 or so people show up. Who bothers with these things anyway? YJB isn't here. Somebody else figures the photo is for invited speakers only. Ah, yes, must be it. Only the elite.
And they go because The Hunger Games. Believe it or not, New Yorkers are just like everyone else. They LOVE the Hunger Games and how sad would it be if the rest of the world saw it and they didn’t. (Special: if you have not read the books because of whatever reason, get over it and read them. They are not what you are expecting – nothing like Twilight or Harry Potter.)
Friend and I came up with the following list:
Cut the grapefruit skin into strips and bring to a boil starting from a pot of cold water. When the water comes to a boil let the peels boil for five minutes, then drain and repeat the process two more times. This will help get rid of some of the bitterness.
Last week while waiting for my daughter’s preschool orientation to begin another mother sat down next to me and soon after a conversation ensued. It started out kind of boring with her seizing the moment to brag about her eldest son. How he also had went through this particular YMCA’s preschool program and was now reading on a much higher grade level than his classmates. Some more chatter along these lines when, just as I am deciding whether to suppress an impending yawn or boldly let it out highlighting my boredom, she steered the conversation away from her little genius, briefly on to herself and then to me. She wanted to know what I do. I gave her my spiel about being a stay-at-home mom and writer. After which this stranger said to me, “You won’t make any money.” I was shocked and amused that this woman who does not even know me, has not read one sentence I have written could so matter-of-factly make such an assessment. Needless to write but the conversation came to an abrupt end as I wanted to put some distance between me and that negativity. Yet maybe she is right. Perhaps I won’t make any money threading words together. Whatever.
It is the last day of my work contract, my beautiful relationship, my honourable relationship with education, with teaching ended for this part of my life, ended as Mr Kelly. If I return it will be as Ms Roche. No one apart from me is mourning today, not for Mr Kelly but for all that I achieved despite struggling with my gender realignment, despite struggling with the ever changing HIV medications. I became a really good teacher, a really nice effective manager. I worked so hard to build my career, four days off in six years. Getting up at five forty five, walking the dogs, dashing to work to ensure my room and then later my department was ready for pupils and staff alike. I adored my classroom; it was and still is my favourite place to organise, to decorate. My classroom, my pupils, lessons made my brain come alive, dance, sing and struggle to find the right way to share information with growing minds. For now I must accept letting go, accept that this stage of my life cannot happen or grow whilst I work as a teacher. I must not be sad but brave, I must believe that this is just a day or two out of my life and that one day I will have my own classroom again and that then I will laugh and smile as pupils learn, as they make mistakes encourage, as they moan listen, as they succeed smile. This is just my day trip away.
But lo, I have been shown the light with this year's release of their follow up album. These guys are simply geniuses! Punk rock parody is not an easy feat; attempts usually fall flat because people forget that at the heart of the best parody you find honest tribute. These Snowmans know their Punk Rock and play it well, and will leave you laughing (and pogo-ing) all the way as they transform old mosh-pit classics into new Christmas carols. They carry the joke to its fullest extreme, too; from the band's name itself (hello, Angry Samoans!) to each album's cover art. The 2009 self-titled debut pays homage to The Adolescents' first LP, with a yuletide red/green color scheme in place of the original's red/blue; this year's offering, the brilliantly titled What We Do Is Festive, takes on the appearance of The Germs' (GI), with holly wreath in place of that band's blue circle logo.
Chilli powder - 1 tsp
And so today I am grateful to start this new year by knowing who I am and what purpose I bring. I encourage each one of you to look deep inside your heart and open up your mind to all the possibilities that life can offer. Make each day count and live with passion. You will be so surprised how your life can change is so many ways.
therefore because every formulating is existent is every formulating already participating
The eggs are graded based on their weight, you see..
Light Bulbs – “If every American home replaced just one light bulb with a light bulb that’s earned the Energy Star, we would save enough energy to light 3 million homes for a year, save about $600 million in annual energy costs, and prevent 9 billion pounds of greenhouse gas emissions per year, equivalent to those from about 800,000 cars.” – energystar.gov Next time a bulb goes out, try replacing them with a CFL bulb or a new LED bulb.
It is a first period of sitting with a middle school band. It is touch and go as to who will be sent to the office. I may send myself to the office and have the principal experience her children live.
6.Place a large skillet over medium heat. Add just enough canola oil to barely cover the bottom, and heat until sizzling hot.
JACKIE BROWN is cinematic bourbon, a seductively slow burn punctuated by hard shots of action. It is likely Tarantino’s least revered film (with the possible exception of DEATH PROOF), perhaps because coming off the landmark PULP FICTION and RESERVOIR DOGS (the director’s first film), JACKIE BROWN is stylized in a completely different manner. Where the first two films exuded cool because Tarantino put his cinematic style front and center, JACKIE BROWN exudes cool because of Pam Grier and Robert Forster. Unlike the new energy seen DOGS and PULP, Grier and Forster give BROWN a worn, experienced energy that stands in direct contrast to Tarantino’s earlier films; where DOGS and PULP feel new, BROWN feels comfortable.
San Pedro, Misiones, Argentina
1 yesterday
Home safe and dry we grabbed some drinks and headed upstairs where it was warm, set about concentrating on the daughter’s homework for the half term, pictures chose, printed out, cut out, we were almost done, the sticking can be done tomorrow, by this time daddy was home, daughter spends time with daddy whilst I catch up on blogging.
Mary Jo Kopechne
Week 7-@ Chicago Bears-8:30pm-October 22, 2012**
“Ours is prettier,” she replies.
I was, of course, out nailing things down, roping and sheeting, dodging debris. Tuesday was the first day back, and my sleep patterns have not readjusted. In a free-will situation, I skew toward nocturnal habits. So, monday night saw me valiantly trying to sleep, in preparation for tuesday.
Not the spirit that ever lashes its own body to terror and death,
The next rainy day.
Zongalero (Fell 22nd); 1982 Sun Lion (Fell 3rd); 1983 Spartan Missile (Unseated 22nd); 1984 Spartan Missile (16th); 1985 Classified (5th); 1986
I posted this in my facebook and a dear friend from high school, Arvin Penaflor, commented on it saying, "Ah the wondrous memories of high school."
Subhadip Sircar and Suvashree Dey Choudhury – Reuters, 02/01/2012
in the end there is hope. hope for a cure. hope for a world without cancer. without pain. without lose. where relay for life wont need to exist anymore. but until then we will fight, raise money, and continue the research necessary to find a cure.
Whether or not one understands the why… the what and how are clear. God desires it, so we should do it.
This in turn leads to raised levels of dopamine, the brain’s reward system called the nucleus accumbens, which can be very addictive.
gift box was in order.
Debt Consolidation Financial loan For Cash Advance Loan Bad debts
reality can, but mustn’t be contained within reality
Things people scoff at, things that get responses like “That’s just CRAZY talk”..yeah, well, maybe….but it is WORKING….how you like them apples darlin’?
But they couldn’t have turned out any better. The final product was even better than I had pictured.
I Hope (my support in Ohio) Dont Dissolve and u Know Im Duckin 5 0 And My Moms Young And Quick 2 Go Off Like Car Alarms (Lil Wayne told me to keep that bit)
Ok, first of all, if an angel approached me I think I would need a pair of Depends (diaper)!
“And I’m Miguel,” said the other.
2 tbsp fresh mint, chopped
… Therefore, boycotting Israeli products from the settlements essentially harms Palestinian livelihood.
Overall we had a good dinner with lots of food and drinks, everything was decent and the herb rubbed pork belly was great! The herb rub doesn’t overpower the taste of the meat but gives it a freshness so you don’t feel as heavy when you’re done eating. There are thousands of samgyeopsal places in Korea but their herb rub really makes it stands out!
Today I would like to give a shout out to a lady who is certainly doing her bit to help, Christy from A Christy Production. A lovely Brisbane blogger who has a heart of gold. Christy not only contributed 3 items to the Qld Flood Appeal Auctions, but she also started a Softies for Smiles campaign, with donated handmade softies going to children affected by the floods... and today she is in Fairfield with her Dad, scrubbing homes that were inundated with dirty flood water!
I'm trying to lose weight. It seems to be working fairly well right now, but I am on Day 4 (after a break at Christmas) and that is when I usually throw it in. Hopefully it's different this time- we'll see :0)
engaging young man who was especially skilled in magic and allusions. He
Of course not. They ONLY target White children for extermination. They ONLY label Whites as “evil-racists” for opposing their own geNOcide. They ONLY DEMAND Whites accept this as their reality. They say they are anti-racist. What they are is anti-white.
“Yes, we could use some medical supplies, if someone gets hurt maybe we can patch them up.”
Snowflake Mini Brad
Wright, has this for experience:
Was he lawfully carrying a gun?
This was not my first thought this morning. My first thoughts were about fear. And my recent efforts–read: eating too much sugar/food, using distraction–the original word “amuse” meaning “to divert the attention, beguile, delude”, or as someone once told me, “to not think”–to avoid fear. When I think about my situation, it is easy for me to be overwhelmed by fear. I suppose it is a lack of trust, faith in God’s provision and a love that, by the Bible’s definition, casts out all fear. But I don’t understand that love–not yet. And when the oil runs out, the house gets cold, and the bank account is empty, I don’t yet understand how trusting God’s provision helps. That’s just the truth. Instead, while reflecting on a conversation had with a friend earlier this week, I realize that the real problem is that all to often I revert to feeling like a cork. Helpless, bobbing about on the sea of life, powerless to affect my direction or circumstances at all. When the sea is calm, I’m okay. When it’s rough, there is nothing I can do to affect being at the mercy of the tides.
Reluctantly I let her hand go, but she held on a noticeable second longer and smiled.
Chase D'Arnaud PIT D 20
Peter Wolf Crier - Doors open at 7:00 p.m. -The Ninth Ward at Babeville
Anyhoo, happy Easter, everybody. Don't eat too many Marshmallow Peeps.
After the events of today and hearing the same message over and over in different ways, I realize it was a sign. A big 2×4 hitting me on the head yelling in my ear to be still. My life is a chinese finger trap. The more I pull, the more I feel a pull holding me in place.
Cute, huh? We think so. We think he’s quite the keeper! See that second to last photo? He’s been doing “happy baby” pose for the last week. LOVES it. My little yogi baby. Must have known that I did prenatal yoga!
It was reported in 2008 that eight British universities, including Oxford and Cambridge, had between them accepted more than £233.5 million from Arab sources since 1995, most of it from Saudi Arabia and other Gulf monarchies. Major donations included £20 million from the late King Fahd of Saudi Arabia towards the Oxford Centre for Islamic Studies.
Breathtaking. Gorgeous. Stunning. How else can I describe this photo? Katelyn James Photography did an amazing job with the whole wedding. So it’s no wonder Beverly said that was the one thing she was happy she splurged on.
And in my heart I can hear the drum
Regardless, with change and time and added liberties comes a much needed equality. The lesbianas are dressing better. Like all women out there, we’re fighting for more dollars. And we’ve decided if they can’t sustain more than one night at a goddermed lesbian bar than feck it, we’re going to the cool-looking venue for the gay boys. So, it’s time…
The older three girls and I went to Nutcracker rehearsals after our pedis while Matt and the littles stayed home. He stayed plenty busy by completing more furniture moves for me. He moved the these two pieces of furniture to the top of our stairs where we have a bunch of random space. He built the pink storage unit a couple years ago, and it's been in just about every room in our house to serve some purpose. The black shelf/hook unit from Hobby Lobby has been in the house for the better part of a year, and eventually we'd like to paint the pink unit black to match.
As a forecaster, then, Yergin’s not even as reliable as a broken clock, and yet the media continue to take his predictions at face value. As far as I know, not one of the reporters in the mainstream media who breathlessly repeated Yergin’s claims about the impossibility of peak oil took so much as a sentence to refer to any of his past predictions, much less how they turned out. It’s weirdly reminiscent of the acquired amnesia that enables believers in apocalyptic prophecies to forget the last half dozen times they talked themselves into believing that the Rapture or the arrival of the Space Brothers or whatever was imminent, and treat the latest prediction with the same earnest enthusiasm.
Mr Doncaster’s comments last night seemed to be suggesting that there was only a very “fine difference” between a newco and a company exiting administration via a CVA.
I have done favours for people and a good friend has said that she has done the same but then there are those that who do not reciprocate – funnily enough it is in within the same group..
I often found myself in complete isolation, and with the irrational thought that I was the only one suffering from the condition. Once I realized that there were others (in numbers that I would have never conceived), I began to feel a glimmer of hope, that at the very least I was not alone. After I read all of the success stories of people who had overcome paruresis and now live happy and fulfilling lives, I realized at that moment that I was done moping. I was no longer going to sit by passively full of self-loathing and just take it. I had been dealt a crappy hand, but I was damn sure going to play it until I was raking in the chips.
* Monochromatic
The BBC (hee hee) is a reading challenge where bloggers sign up to read books by British writers throughout 2011.
Donnelly acknowledges those questions, but says intellection property protection is more of a concern with consumer goods.
Did you yearn for a natural large plate format photographic feel?
Reporting Results:
The stale sweat of the man sitting next to me
Publishing is no different to many other facets of business. Every company wants to shift as much of the 'dog work' off somewhere else if they can. Hence, 90% of medium to large publishing houses use a literary agent as their 'screen' and will not entertain an unsolicited MS. They know a reputable literary agent will not submit a manuscript unless it is professionally edited and as near as possible to publishing standard. This is now the norm, but it was not always the case. The youth of today have far greater literacy skills than say the youth of 30 years ago. And I bet many are more savvy about skills like selling, promotion and the publishing industry in general.
And I’ll only know if I go.
In addition to Music, Celibidache studied Mathematics and
If you had been particularly well-behaved, or completed some assignment exceptionally well, or passed your desk inspection with flying colours, you would likely receive a Holy Card as you left the classroom that day. These were much coveted and prized. For years I kept mine; pictures of 'St. Francis of Assisi', and 'St. Anthony of Padua', and 'St. Agnes of Rome' depicted on the front, and their legends in all their graphic glory printed on the back. By the end of the year, I had about a dozen Holy Cards, and all the children in my class possessed at least one.
— Alternatively, some stations can be be destroyed by making the building in which they’re in collapse. When this is possible, it also happens for one station out of the pair you’re each time fighting for, not for both. Otherwise it would be too easy to win just by launching mortars or gunning down with tanks.
Now for the most interesting feature, an FM Transmitter. Current Blackberry models all have the ability to accept micro-sd cards up to about 16gb. You are able to get free software to sync your iTunes libraries to your Blackberry…as long as the content is DRM free. Once the music is on the unit you can play it back through headphones and or Bluetooth devices. The Visor Clip takes this whole process one step further…yes it will play back the content on itself or allow you to press the FM button on the left hand side and select a frequency to tune in on your car stereo. Voila, your blackberry is now broadcasting through your car stereo. This also works for phone calls… AWESOME! Impressed yet…? There is more, when you live in a congested area it is sometimes hard to find a FM frequency that works well with transmitters (we all know they are not great). Simply press and hold the FM button on the Visor and it will scan and announce a free frequency it finds on FM…tune your radio and you are set to go.
Moalusi says he believes the paper has found such a big readership because it goes beyond being an ordinary newspaper. "We get involved. Our readers are not objects that we write about...we use our widespread circulation to say: ‘Let's get issues known. Let's get issues solved... If we win these battles, then we know we are much appreciated. If we lose them, then we fight even more - and that's what newspapers should be about."
Come Hop with us as we explore the world of Steam Punk with these digital stamps from CopicmarkerScrapbooking. They were drawn by the owner Colleen. My special letter for this Hop is G so make sure you go to all the hops in order to get the special word and you will have a chance to win the new set of Copic Colors. Everyone who completes the hop will win all the digital images.
Here is another example using Pinks. Again I have marked the area where the Copics have feathered out of the image. I am definitely NOT happy with this quality of work!
Second, it ignores a very important factor. That school is not a service that operates in isolation from that very same society. School, for most parents, is seen as a partnership. It serves to educate and enable our most precious resources within a safe and secure environment in association with the children’s family. Both teacher and parent have an essential role to play in the child’s education. We as parents can communicate with our kids and teach them about all sorts of things. We dissect issues that arise from classroom discussions or TV news reports or pick over issues we feel are important. We can all make a difference.
In today's webisode, we move from the kitchen to the garden as my good friend Holly Vesecky, co-owner of Hollyflora, shows us how create four types of flower arrangements.
I was at an Engagement Party on Saturday night and there was a married childless woman, a mother of a two year old boy and myself talking about children. I was telling the other ladies how much I enjoy how Missy Moo and I sing Nursery Rhymes every morning after her bottle, how we sing our ABC's at each nappy change and the games we play to excite her sense of touch and improve her motor skills. I love watching her reactions and seeing the improvements in her.
Eddie had really researched the best approach to take, talking to many friends and experts in the field. Jessica’s pig seemed to be right on schedule. The last month as her pig started to climb rapidly in pounds, she- along with Ed- made the needed adjustments to be sure the animal would not be too big.
Which I THOUGHT was the idea of calling false starts! Not to eliminate individuals but to ensure that no one athlete gets an unfair advantage. As I've said on more than one occasion this rule has simply become punitive in nature and is nothing about the races themselves any more. I watched Usain Bolt commit a false start in a race last summer, I can only imagine what will happen if he does so again with the current rule in effect!
And He looked around and said,
I never would have said that I have valor.
As I said, Daisy has the better eye (though they both wear glasses; who knows), but Switch has a laptop, which he uses to misdirect and fool her into thinking he’s out of ammo. It’s more chess than pistols, as Switch uses his heretofore ambidexterity to get the winning shot just one-hundreth of a second before Daisy shoots him. Margin for error was zero, but he had confidence. Sket-dan up 2-1. Now, will the ringer, Roman, lose the “love challenge” against Uryuu, or will Bossun lose the last match to the council Prez? We’ll have to find out next week. Rating: 3.5
Police are warning car dealers in Nouakchott not to sell or discard used tires, in an apparent bid to block the fashion seen in recent protests to pile burning tires in the roads. I personally hope they are successful, as I am not a fan of these anti-environmental and rather juvenile acts.
Blitzkrieg could be considered pragmatic because it worked where it was applied, until of course it no longer worked. Does that not mean that Blitzkrieg was not pragmatic or does it mean that other factors interfered with the total success of the German war machine which eventually diluted the success; the rightness, (and thus the pragmatism) of lightning war?
"Are you okay?" Cassandra asked. David wasn't sure if she was referring back to his mood and his state of love for her, or the fact that he had almost fallen."
Based in Plano, TX, Cinemark has theaters all over the country, though not all of them are participating in this Reel Classics series (upcoming titles include Citizen Kane, The Searchers, North by Northwest and Cabaret); other chains under the Cinemark umbrella include Century, CineArts and Tinseltown theaters.
Ladies and Gentlemen, enjoy the show.
It was a segregated pool. Like, by design, not by accident.
Describing her project, the artist says:
Frank's cousin Jimmy (Huey's driver) gets arrested for trying to shoot a girl. Richie finds out and they pressure him to wear a wire while talking to Frank. In Viet Nam, the General tells Frank "Quitting while you're ahead, isn't the same as quitting." Frank arranges to have his shipment sent to the US. He calls Huey, while Jimmy listens nearby with his wire, and Richie gets the flight number of the drug shipment, which is a military plane. Richie gets a warrant to search the plane and presents it. Most of the cargo is coffins with bodies of the dead Army men. They tear apart everything but the coffins. Trupo meanwhile invades Frank's house, claiming a no knock warrant. He has his men destroy everything looking for the getaway cash "every gangster has lying around." Trupo kills Frank's dog and finds a stash beneath the doghouse. Richie is prevented from looking in the coffins by the US Attorney General (Roger Bart) who tells them that the PR resulting from their suspicion of the Army transporting drugs into the US is causing pressure for the entire office to be shut down. He tells the Attorney that Frank Lucas, a black man is his target. The Attorney, hasn't heard of Frank and takes this as a joke, saying "No fucking nigger has ever accomplished what the American Mafia hasn't in 100 years!" Richie responds "And you would know that how? Why? Cause your head is stuck up your fucking ass?" He kicks RIchie out and Toback tells Richie to make sure it sticks. Richie's men keep an eye on the coffins.
“I firmly believe that having a reputation of being honest and reliable for my clients is the recipe for success.” While others seek to profit by cutting corners, or recommending unnecessary services to customers, Tracy believes that a good reputation and consistent service will reap bigger profits in the long run. By being trustworthy, Tracy believes that her and her team will enjoy a long term profitable business that serves small to mid-sized businesses.
Oak platform sealed with coconut fibre and putty.
So I’ll be taking deep breaths all day and thinking positive thoughts- wish me luck chickadees, I’ll need all the good energy I can get tomorrow!
V. On Outings
In a suspended fury
Global warming isn’t just an Earth thing,
“Shut it quickly Mary,” he rasped, rolling to his feet to help his wife with the heavy metal door.
Conceptual art is art in which the concept(s) or idea(s) involved in the work take precedence over traditional aesthetic and material concerns.
So that into his likeness you’d grow.
Band members: (from left to right) Eric "Halvo" Halvorsen (bassist/backup vocalist) Nick Santino (lead vocalist/rhythm guitarist) Andrew Cook (drummer) and Justin Richards (Guitarist/backup vocalist).
New Order Bizarre Love Triangle UK
I’ve been out of range for a bit, but Rosie (aaah Rosie) has free WiFi if you support the Middle Shop by buying stuff, which I do. So I will upload this while I can. I have a post coming about the history of this area too. It’ll be a long but hopefully interesting read. With pictures and stuff.
Perhaps.
The wall hangings are displayed in the windows for the duration of the exhibition and will be available for purchase when it ends on 14 April. If you are interested in purchasing either of these handmade pieces, please contact Equinox here.
There are two things I’m learning about saying yes - “Yes you may”, “yes - but only” or “yes and”
The Lord has granted us a major victory today. Blessed be the name of the Lord. The weapons formed against the work of God have been disarmed.
phone: 217-698-4170 or 1-800-8411-6167 (V / TTY)
Professionals say that the differences between ‘super-responders’ and ‘non-responders’ could be down to ‘gene’ make up, and I am not disputing this; however, maybe the ‘non-responders’ were simply not doing the right exercise for them plus some ‘gene’ ology thrown in??
According to police logs:
Some liberals on the other side of the political spectrum believe the government should play a vital role in the lives of the people, from cradle to grave. They believe the lowly masses cannot take care of themselves. For Democrats, government must step in and take up the role of caretaker. As Nancy Pelosi said in 2011: “I view my work in politics as an extension of my role as a mom.”[i] This progressive viewpoint is known as government paternalism, and has been defined as “a policy or practice of treating or governing people in a fatherly manner, especially by providing for their needs without giving them rights or responsibilities.”[ii]
The Tryst Retro Brunch is only available on Sundays from 11AM to 2:30PM, and reservations are recommended so please call 781-641-2227.
Today, Cox’s Bazar is one of the most-visited tourist destinations in Bangladesh, however it has yet to become a major international tourist destination, with no international hotel chains operating here, due to lack of publicity and transportation.
This is my last blog to post for the day. I am out of coffee, although it is not beyond the powers of reason that I should make some more.
of wildness.
Have loved playing with Picots as you can see.
Okay, I lost my train of thought. I think I had a point when I started.
My heart is bound by the earth and these walls.
06. The Destruction Of The Captain America Collection
In addition to these proposed changes, there are many other changes which will have a significant impact on disabled persons seeking Medicaid coverage of long term care. Persons and groups wishing to submit written comments or testify at the September 13, 2010 public hearings are urged to contact Dutton & Casey P.C. at (312)899-0950. Public response may result in positive changes to the proposed regulations
I have a standard Wi-fi Ipad, but at UK, I was given access to their Internet system. That meant I could send information and photos to my fellow researchers and get feedback as I worked. I also purchased a keyboard to go with my Ipad, and took notes at the Filson House–transcribing what I saw on the back pages of the little prayerbook.
Last week, though, we heard some good news from school. One of Ayden's paras had been working with him to get him to go down the slide at school by himself. And she had succeeded! Shortly after Ayden started going down the slide at home by himself. Then we went to the park....and I'll just let this video speak for itself:
05. Baker's Keyboard Blues (B. Hackett) 2:51
Here are the saving graces from the weekend:
Listen to your body today and pay keen attention to where you are sore. Shoulders/neck bothering you…You sank into the hand stands and failed to actively press. Lower back/chest sore…You need work on perfect push ups. Listen to your body…Be safe and have an awesome weekend, ENJOY!!!
It is undeniable that many of these organisations are Umno members. Najib is facing a problem of how to implement the “1 Malaysia” concept within the party?
***Do not forget to mention which category you wish your project to be considered when submitting your photos and project description!***
When the bloke in the Sheffield Tap said his piece, he said it with a threatening tone. “We spread the word about places like this” was delivered with the protection racketeer’s implicit threat that ‘the word’ could just as easily be bad as good if his demands weren’t met. The Tap needn’t worry – no word this pathetic little man could spread would have anything like the power of the positive buzz coming from the vast majority of decent, sensible people – CAMRA members and non-members alike – who are raving about the pub.
If you can do better, let me know what you’ve got by commenting below. Good or bad, I’m a sucker for a punchline
“To transform the emptiness of loneliness, to the fullness of aloneness. Ah, that is the secret of life.” Sunita Khosla
Also, if you're going to ask her why she's not in school, be prepared for her to tell you she dropped out in the first grade. She has her daddy's sense of humor. :-) Don't look shocked. Laugh instead. She's being funny.
Experimenter (here): Bani Abidi (1 installation). While the content and message of this piece were of less interest to me, I was intrigued by the agglomeration of photographic layers, of the pictures of pictures (in various sizes) then stacked and placed in spatial relationship to each other in a single collection.
It turns out that as part of a story on gay rights issues the PBS program Frontline included a quiz designed by researchers to gauge how homophobic someone might be. Matt and Mat took this quiz and shockingly found that they weren’t homophobic at all. This news so delighted them that they broadcast it on Liberty Counsel’s Faith and Freedom show. Peter was so enchanted that he linked the broadcast from his website and took the quiz himself. What do you know? He isn’t homophobic either!
Up next I went with the Pho-Tay, their buckwheat O-Tay aged in the phunk barrel.
Lately, on a few races, I have decided to inform them of who wins. Sometimes it's very obvious and they still call it a tie.
Logical, methodical, all in shapes and sizes of lies and pride
More than 85 percent of global evaporation and more than 75 percent of global precipitation occur over the ocean. The measurement of sea surface salinity will allow scientists to follow the ocean’s role in the Earth’s water cycle. Freshwater runoff from rivers and melting ice change salinity and affect the movement of water within the oceans of the world. Aquarius/SAC-D will provide important new information about how Earth’s freshwater moves between the ocean and atmosphere and around the globe
“Er you didn’t want to keep them separate?” I ask. Rob raises his eyebrows at this.
A little warning before I share our art project. This is a very, very, and did I mention very messy project. Be sure you are outside and quite aways from the nearest wall or other surface(that you prefer not to get splattered with paint). Also be sure the paper is a long enough distance from you, being too close creates even more splattering paint. Yes, we learned some of this the hard way. That said the mess was oh so very worth it and Junior had a blast.
Cut the chicken breast into long strips. Add pressed garlic, salt and pepper. Fry the strips over medium heat until golden brown.
Really? Not the UPS guy or waitress at TGIF’s? Not the soccer coach or piano teacher or kid selling Girl Scout Cookies? (Can’t be too careful!)
Killer Joe is a dramedy about a young man whose life is endangered by his debts. In order to collect insurance money to pay off his debts, Joe (McConaughey) puts a hit out on his evil mother.
You are a proven liar and about as trustworthy as Blair and Brown. Isn't 400 British soldiers dead in Afghanistan enough for you? Your WMDs (words of mass deception) are far more dangerous to Britain than Iran's.
can't imagine what a wonderful friendly group these eagle
Happy Sunday !!!
Coexistence and peace is possible, the only thing we need is to want it and accept it.
“Why am I strapped to the bed?!” I asked one of the nurses.
But under a little-known South African law, it would have been illegal for anyone to reveal the contents of Mr. Maharaj’s statements to investigators because they were made during a process in which he had to waive his right to remain silent. Even though the paper withheld the statements, Mr. Maharaj filed a criminal complaint, saying that it had intended to publish the information.
Praire Madness - Circles In The Sand
Even my girls are starting to get the meaning of what a good problem is.
20. I paid my bills, didn’t go into the red again, and I survived this month.
Now since I can't change the tile, the best easy/ low cost change would be to...
In España, to say COGER to grab. In Argentina, COGER, is to have sex.
Recently I bought a book called The Doctors Book on Home Remedy. It's a good book and I think it is a should have a copy kind of book. Allow me to share with you some tips on how to treat minor burns i.e first and second degree burns.1st or 2nd degree burns includes scalds from boiling water, burns caused by brief contact with hot pot,oven coils and splatters of hot oil during frying etc.
Conditions: Thick fog
FITNESS ... the kids are keen and we parents also want to improve our fitness, so we're on a mission to build up our stamina, fitness and endurance, to prepare for a few family fun runs and bush walks throughout the year. Hopefully with persistence (and perhaps prayer and antihistamines) my legs will stop becoming so unbearably itchy every time I do more than stroll. We also intend to play tennis more often (like more than twice a year) and go for family bike rides. Last week I went canoeing, which was a fun way to start the year!
the earth is hurt and emptied.
We went to watch the boys in their swim class
MC have got their marketing so far wide of the mark that they will alienate everyone if they're not careful. After all you're already patronising the women and then start calling the blokes that drink the fizzy piss that pays the bills 'laddish', well, that's just plain rude.
David Cahill - Until Tomorrow
Rich and Stu were in Huddersfield but they had sent up some of their Human Cannonball up for us to try. It's a big old beast weighing in at 9.2%ABV. It's Double IPA which means that it's had the hop volume turned up to Spinal Tap levels. And it's very drinkable. Very drinkable. It's chock full of loads of North American hops and has a sweet kick to it and a strong, pungent aroma that reminds some of cat piss. Others, such as Brown, of "damp dishcloths". For some in the room, it was their first experience of such a big beer. It was interesting watching peoples reactions. Some were instantly taken by it. Others, slowly won over by it.
they froze.
“Thank you, I’ll be ready.” Ohobilah sent him out with a small nod of her head and he responded with a deep, respectful bow, closing the door behind him. “It’s a good thing I’m already dressed,” she sighed, picking a hair off her skirt. Behind her, the queen could feel her servant pinning the last strand of hair up.
All in all, it was time & money well spent . . . and I can't wait to dive down again another day trip of eats, drinks and adventures.
I Found You
start a blog
Place your hamburger on top of the soup, then add your veggies. This is a great place for the kiddos to help out. Let them add what veggies they want and the amount they want as well. Remember, kids love to eat what they help make.
Kessler believes that Sullivan, who has been in charge of the service since 2006, has presided over corner-cutting and a general atmosphere of laxness.
Asked by GQ if he would justify the suicide-murder of Tony Blair (with the tender GQ proviso that only the prime minister would be killed in this putative assassination) Galloway responded as follows:
Olivia didn’t say a word as she walked into the cell.
these second thoughts
This past weekend, when she and her boyfriend came to visit us in our new home, it took me only a few moments to decide what salad would accompany our pasta dinner. It wasn’t at all difficult to reproduce and was just as delicious as I remembered. Even the boy who doesn’t like salad had seconds.
So after all that it was surprisingly annoying when we still got dinged for few foreign transaction fees for purchases we made while in the United States on our Citi AAdvantage card – nearly $50 worth. Apparently the group we had booked our Inca Trail adventure through is based in the UK and I downloaded software from a firm in Vancouver. Doh!
When I look at my priorities, caring for animals scores pretty high on my list. I am draining the emergency account again to pay the vet.
How about the common Malaysian? Just say sorry and there will be no need to be punished for cheating, theft, robbery, murder, criminal breach of trust, etc.
"That would take too long to tell," said the stork, and off he strode.
Now before you wonder if i've lost my mind, i didn't buy these from Her, Claire picked them up from a blog sale for me to try, along with some full sizes of her repackaged eyeshadows so i can swatch more colours against their TKB counterparts and get rid of any ideas that i might be lying about what's in my Lime Crime sample baggies :) Thanks beauteous xx
I need to go forward. But there are some things, some habits I keep struggling with. (Almost as if it were an addiction) and I don’t think God will let me step into my NEXT chapter unless… I let go of this LUKEWARMness in some areas of my life.
My son and I made a drive around the neighborhood last Thanksgiving, because we always get a kick out of seeing roads emptied and businesses shuttered on major holidays. It’s kind of a fun preview of what he might expect when he drives around with his son some bleak day in our dismal economic future.
We walked parts of Otrobanda a year ago, and this time wanted to go a little deeper in and on the other side of a busy boulevard. We found some gems and some spots were a bit spooky, but all the people we saw were friendly and either volunteered a “hello” or responded to ours.
George E.Stone Alcatraz Island
We had a mellow week, for once.
2) Printed on My Heart (1758) by Laurie Alice Eakes
Blueberry
The Man With Sixteen Balls
Professor MacDonald has won fame and a following on the far right for having “explained the Jews,” particularly in his book The Culture of Critique (pdf). And one has to respect him for the courage and sheer data doggedness with which he has taken on in depth an important and shunned subject — the leftist tilt of the Jewish ethny and its negative effect on Gentile societies.
1 cup of raw tehina (sesame paste)
1 big onion (chopped finely)
The past week I also found out that we should have funding for our OPG kids to go on their Earthwatch expeditions, so am now in a tricky position of organising all logistics, visas, passports, flights, funds, and preparing them, as well as the really hard task of breaking the news that on the positive side, at least some of them will be going on life changing expeditions, but on the bad side, not all of them will be going this year, but that they still have a chance in the future.
Cogito Ergo Sum
Jenny asked me yesterday, "How's Sammy doing?" and I said "BAD!" The boy has really been pushing boundaries lately. Don't get me wrong, he's still the sweetest thing in the world, but he does not like to listen to Mommy and Daddy. He's super independent. I asked Ms. Dee Dee how he does in timeout at daycare, and she said "Sam? He's never in time out, here!" I guess he just decides to act out at home. Yesterday was picture day at daycare and Ms. Dee Dee said Sammy did GREAT! She said the photographer kept saying how cute he was and he was smiling so nice. I can't wait to see them! She said he was the only kid that would sit on the fake log next to the fake frog. She said he loved the frog, and all the other kids were scared of it. I love when I hear stuff like that. Onto the cute pictures...
Nothing left to lose and no more sitting on suburban fences.
Today our whole family took a trip to the Nashville Zoo, where every time we go I'm reminded of how uncomfortable it is to walk through the gate at the same time as an obnoxious, out-of-state family. Without a doubt, you always end up walking alongside them the WHOLE TIME. Here's a thought. It's flip-flop weather, so cut your damn toenails. If I see one more set of toenails scraping the cement I will have to start a charity called, Pennies for Pedicures.
of another failure
All of us had wonderful day shopping, eating and talking nonsense.
When I did get home I had to knuckle down and make a couple of cards I'd been putting off. It's my sister in law's Anniversary on Monday so Mum in law asked me to make one for her to give.
Stephen then began to edit the diary, which now makes a charming and nostalgic read, beginning with Koichi’s journey from Japan to England. He arrived in Hebden Bridge at 5am on January 3, 1935, where he started work sexing chickens the first same day.
To be honest, up until about a year ago when I thought about cabbage, I thought of it mostly as a garnish. I had never bought cabbage and cooked with it, and wasn't really sure how to.....
But, I'm thankful that I can find still find the time to sit to the sewing table... in a stolen moment or two... in effort to clear my head, per say.
Let me say first that I read a lot of mystery fiction, and most of the TV shows I watch deal with murder and mayhem. It’s hard to get something by me anymore. After all, one does not study literature for this long without learning how to deconstruct a text and figure out how it all works. This one took me entirely by surprise. It was awesome. There are two separate “Whodunit Reveal” scenes, and in each of them I was knocked back. The conclusion, as Holmes would say, was elementary–incredibly, elegantly simple. All the little oddnesses suddenly made sense, and I felt like Watson: seeing but not observing.
Funeral for a Friend
When cutting the vegetables, the key is to keep the pieces at a size that will cook consistently. Since both types of potatoes will cook at about the same rate, they should be the same size. Carrots and parsnips have about the same cooking rate as well. The pear is an unexpected ingredient, and if there are any stray hands at home that like to snatch them from the bowl, I recommend that you increase the quantitiy and add 2 instead of 1.
So, back to the HSTs - you'll need:
One of them stepped forward bravely as the other two watched with wide eyes and shy smiles. She pointed toward the fountain and asked in her soft, broken English,
Mandy Slater – Internal Communication #2
Bad cess on patience. That's all I've got to say. Well, bad cess on patience and on the possibility of 2-6 inches of snow tonight, especially since just yesterday, I was bragging to a friend of mine in California about how mild a December this has been.
We currently have monthly sales with a selection of kits available … in Neutral, Boy, Girl and Themed…
Artist: João Gilberto
Friday - chicken strips, crockpot potato wedges, baked beans
It’s brand new so please excuse any hiccups in the first few days but I couldn’t wait to share it with you!
And this is Teddy's drawing for Great-Grandma's birthday. (May 2011) It's a birthday sand castle with shell windows and balloons.
Yesterday was my last day at the firm. It was more bittersweet than I expected. Despite losing a lot of people in the last year, I still have some good friends that I will miss a lot. I worked hard to build a good reputation for myself (and to be the first to know all the good gossip) and I'll miss that. Friends/co-workers took me out to lunch where we started with a round of red wine (it was rainy and cold, it seemed fitting) and then I opened up a few bottles of champagne in my office at 4, so I ended up with a crowd as I frantically forwarded myself personal emails I needed to save and transferred a bunch of pictures to a thumb drive. We also laughed and reminisced and promised to keep in touch. I'll be missed and that makes me feel sad and warm and fuzzy at the same time. All in all, it was a good 3.5 year chapter of my career, even if I can't say I enjoyed every single minute.
All that said, the final moments of battle were well done. Roger MacBride Allen moves deftly from scene to scene, keeping readers abreast of all the action. The tension was there. I spent the last part of the book glued to the pages. This was far more exciting than Assault at Selonia but not as interesting as Ambush at Corellia.
These are just some of the best practices that I would like to share to help you address your people retention and employee attrition challenges and to evade the dangers of “brain drain” or “intellectuals’ loss”. Hopefully, with these being put to practice, you would be able to make more loyal, more committed, more dedicated, more motivated, and more satisfied employees in your team members and that they wouldn’t be admonished to turn in their resignation letters and look for greener pastures somewhere else; somewhere else that knows how to take good care of their employees better.
-Concerns over bringing a black child into a racist city
I wonder if this will see a traditional EU wheeze coming to the fore, whereby HE students are taught for free in countries not of their birth? Thus putting the burden of paying for the staff on the host country. Will there be pressure on Scottish universities to increase places, if so, staff costs will rise as will pressures on other resources and facilities. Any bulge in the birth rate will either force discrimination against EU students or an increase in places needed.
Bestows one final patronising kiss,
Developed in 1973, the multifamily community is 259,200 square feet on 17.9 acres in the Stone Mountain submarket. The property, which was 84 percent leased at the time of sale, has been renamed Marquise Ridge.
Wonder if I'll ever "feel" ready?
experienced and far-ranging craft beer fans. There is minimal attention to decor, but that’s okay --it’s basic and comfortable. There is no wait service; you go to the bar and order what you want from the friendly and very knowledgeable staff. Decent prices, too. $7.50 for five samplers. There is also a cool electronic beer menu board above the bar. A must if you are in downtown Portland.
he takes me to a ZILLION furniture stores in one day all around the city & then won't commit to buying anything.... :) (At this point I have playing the part of Goldilocks down to a science.)
I think somewhere in the sadness of my previous relationship, I lost sight of my joyful and cheery disposition. This was partially why I included dancing and making music more, because I know those two things bring me a lot of joy. There's something lovely and romantic about being creative.
Story Builder offers a rich and fun environment for improving the ability to create a narrative.
Most people think of business people as McCloskey put it, someone who buys low and sells high.
Jake come in with a punch, but Nic wraps him up and pins him against the cage. Some knees now from Nic, but Jake gets him off balance and takes him down to the ground withBelllanding in the top position. He has a mount, but Nic is on his side. Jake’s corner is calling for elbows.
No matter how many times I fall,
Boogaard is still young in his late 20's and I thought from the moment we acquired him it was a tremendous addition. He will no doubt miss a little time, and while he does, I can only fix my mind on one person; Colton Orr.
(Major huffing and puffing from back seat)
And here is a little photo of how that turned out...
I've been to Prasino a handful of time now and I absolutely love it. The name of the cafe is the Greek word for "green" which is at the heart of the cafe's mission - "to provide healthy food at an affordable price in a modern, environmentally conscious setting."
It isn’t about you. This isn’t your chance to score points, or to show how great your art is by belittling the art of the person asking. The artist that takes this opportunity to crow about their own prowess, at the expense of another, is lacking in self assuredness (see my earlier blog on this subject). It certainly is not the time to be dismissive, rude, disinterested, disengaged, or cruel. You should neither damn with faint praise, nor sycophantically slather on the effusive and false compliments. Never, ever patronise.
And light, God
Compassion and everything that love can bring
R1- ch3, sl st around post of next row up- repeat, working @ an angle towards the tip of the tail, then work down the opposit side finishing at the same row as beginning sl st.
Seriously? Are you going to put me through this every day? Wasn’t the vomiting enough to convince you to not make me ride in this car?
other communicable diseases
Do not feed pets outside. This not only attracts young cougars but also many small animals, such as mice and raccoons, that cougars prey upon.
It's pretty obvious, I suppose, that she was having a 'Hello Kitty' birthday this year. I purchased a cake tin and the set of icing colours so I could make her a 'Hello Kitty' cake. I tried hard but it just didn't turn out the way I was expecting.
Really brings back memories of my childhood..and it always seems to happen on the bus. THE BUS! *insert snarl look*
Today the ritual of this sabbat still has a strong sexual and fertility feel but because of modern inhibitions and the lack of secluded places free from prying eyes usually lacks the spontaneity and abandon of past rituals.
Line Up:
The release date is set for 5/25.
Liquor Liability covers you in the event that claims related to liquor are made against you. Most classically, such claims involve damages as a result of the actions of an intoxicated person, such as a lawsuit filed by someone involved in a crash caused by someone who was drunk.
branch
As the laws of attack govern those of riposte, to avoid being harmed by the asperities of my character, all my servants adopted in their own the same withdrawal tactics, and always at the same point; in compensation for this, they took advantage of the gaps in my defences to gain ground there. Of these gaps I knew nothing, any more than of the ground gained in the spaces they left, precisely because they were gaps. But my servants, as their faults became gradually more apparent, taught me of their existence. It was in the defects which they invariably acquired that I learned of my own natural, invariable defects, and their character presented me with a sort of negative proof of my own.
The film was good, the special effects were cool and Wolverine looked lickable as ever. The only thing that marred a pleasant couple of hours were some of the other people in the cinema.
even sundials, all those compulsive timepieces
The next part of this discussion is looking at the assumption that these customs can be transplanted into another religious setting other than that of their origin. In the Catholic Church, this is where Negro Spirituals are put into liturgical hymnals, or Protestant praise and worship music is performed at Mass, or Protestant architectural principles are incorporated into parish design, or Eastern meditation is incorporated into Catholic spirituality. The assumption is that these customs will bear fruit in a Catholic setting because they have borne fruit in their natural setting; that the Catholic's experience of the Faith will be enriched by these customs that have enriched other cultures. This implies several problematic things.
When we started Cooper on solids, he LOVED them, but for the last 3 or so weeks, he hasn't been interested at all, especially in vegetables. At Target the other day, I grabbed an organic pouch of fruits and veggies mixed together that sounded fine-- nothing but water, blueberries, beets, and apples (or some other combo-- can't remember). He GOBBLED them up and then ate a jar of carrots I've had in the cabinet forever. But the homemade stuff I slave over? He won't touch it. SO we are all on jars now, and it's a great time saver.
And when you do get an answer, you probably will appreciate why readers are taking an issue with those words reportedly uttered by Datin Seri Rosmah. You will also be able to appreciate the fact that people at every teh tarik session are sneering at this latest episode involving your spouse again.
Dr.R.Simangaliso Kumalo, the head of the School of Religion and Theology at the University of KwaZulu-Natal,wrote: "Pretoria seemed to side with dictators like President Robert G.Mugabe in Zimbabwe or Col.Muammar Qaddafi in Libya blending its debts to those who supported it in the liberation struggle with a hard-nosed pragmatism.
It is bad, right now, my mood.
I wanted to send her a card that would let her know I was thinking of her, but I did not want to send the traditional “get-well-soon” card. When I discovered stamps by Art Impressions, I knew they would be perfect. How can you not laugh when you look at this …
Bankroll Management II + Test
“Charlotte took me back to see Meg. It just makes me cry.” Charlotte looked up into her son’s face, “Then I get selfish and sort of glad that I never had to fly overseas to sit by your bedside. I'm not sure I could have handled it.”
“One of the most famous legends of Central Asia tells of a horseman,” he told me as we sat in his book-lined room in Rome. “The horseman is the standard-bearer of the great Khan. As the Khan’s army are entering a city after a glorious victory, the standard-bearer sees a dark lady looking at him. The dark lady has fearsome eyes, as if she is looking right inside him. He becomes scared that this woman is a witch and she has put the Evil Eye on him, so he goes to the great Khan and tells him his fears and says he wants to go to another city.
New to this set is “On Blue,” a video essay by film studies professor Annette Insdorf where she gives a brief background to the Three Colors trilogy before examining the themes explored in Blue. She also analyzes the film’s striking style as well as the moving classical score.
In the next couple of weeks I will be making a minor contribution to a television series that is intending to plot the evolution of our daily meals - breakfast, lunch and dinner. This is very familiar territory to me, as in 2000, together with art historians Peter Brown, Andrew Moore and Gillian Riley, I curated the major travelling exhibition Eat, Drink and Be Merry, which surveyed the development of the English table and our meals in great detail through major paintings and the decorative arts. We recreated dinners, suppers, breakfasts and teatimes from many different periods using original tableware, silver, porcelain and glass as well as food. Just for the record I have not seen anything yet that matches the scope and vision of that exhibition in any of the British TV programmes that have so far touched on food history. Just to illustrate what I mean, have you ever seen anything like this on tellie?
Merap project director Ong Kian Meng has a very valid question to ask EC about this haphazard scenario.
That’s it. I’ve got a busy rest of the week and a busy weekend coming up, then, this time next week I’ll be preparing for a two-day jaunt up to Flagstaff on work-related business and I’m hoping to visit Mogollon Brewing during my free time on Friday. (See them at http://www.mogbrew.com/)
This is the University of Bologna, which is the oldest continually operating university in the entire world! Pretty impressive, right? The earliest accounts are from 1088, so it’s been a house of learning for almost 1,000 years! That is so unreal to me, and I’m so excited to visit!
SPEND $40 AND RECEIVE 15% OFF
we had breakfast at brooks and cristis while we listened to the morning session of conference and then we had them over for dinner that night. and.. that my friends, was the weekend. how was yours?
During this whole back and forth, the guy she brought with her is grabbing things. He appears to be around 20, but I can tell he’s not quite right. Anyway, he’s reaching for the merch on the counter and putting them in his pockets. He also put three medications within reach in his pockets. He even grabbed the laptop I had in front of my when I averted my attention briefly. He had sticky fingers. So I had to keep my eye on him and all items within his reach the whole time I’m talking to his mother(?). It was exhausting. Toward the end, he left the room, and came back later saying he just had a seizure.
"Fallin' Stars" is 1978 (it's only missin' the Budokan chicks screaming). Hey- those hot little Japanese gals screamin' on "I Want You To Want Me" are probably grandmothers by now. And wtf does "Green Was The Color Of Her Love" mean? Money? Decay? Usually my taste in romantic partners runs towards cold and blue, since dead girls don't say "no". But your mileage may vary.
Today I’m starting with the sunshine. The rest of my list today (in no apparent order or importance) is as follows:
Incidentally, about one week ago I was almost shot by a gun-slinging lunatic, who mistook me for an intruder. The incident happened when I gave a friend of mine a lift to a complex one evening where he had some personal business to attend to. While I was waiting in the parking lot in my own vehicle, listening to the radio and minding my own business, a resident of the complex (I assume), who reeked of alcohol, suddenly appeared from nowhere and jammed the barrel of a gun in my face. I am now more convinced than ever that the miserable state of affairs in this country is causing people to go bonkers!
- A packet of Amaretti biscuits (crumbled, not crushed)
"Idiot wind, blowing every time you move your mouth/ Blowing down the backroads headin’ south/ Idiot wind, blowing every time you move your teeth/
Let me know if you'd like to interview me. I'd love to do a book launch blog tour around my chum's blogs.
“Dear friends, I urge you, as foreigners and exiles, to abstain from sinful desires, which wage war against your soul.” (I Peter 2:11 NIV)
June 26 Montreal, QC Bell Centre
1 ounce self raising flour
Fact #7: Rice Krispies are only silent for Sara Lomas.
“In fact, it was related to me by a reliable source that one BN councillor, his wife and two children were the lucky recipients of four 1Malaysia laptops, one for each of them,” Bian said.
The blue and green versions of this dress are in-store now and any piece can be special ordered for color and size. Check out the fashion section in the latest issue of Venue Magazine to see the dresses in action. See you Friday!
DJ: He's ok.
I drew these owls for Aunt Ruth, as a birthday present. Owls have always been and remain wonderful birds for me. I think I was 15 years old when these were done. I did not see them again for ten years. After Aunt Ruth died, her son gave them back. They were kept in a trunk and moved wherever I went. A few years ago I found them again. I took them to work, where they now hang in my office. I see them Monday through Friday. They remind me of Aunt Ruth, and the ‘road not taken” viz. becoming an artist.
15 - Your birthday
How are you balancing the demands of a debut author with that of a writer? Do you set aside some days for writing and others for authoring?
Machine: Boss Kut Gazelle
This week the 4th main character gets introduced to us. However she does not join the club yet. With her introduction, the cast is now complete. She has a crush on Satoshi but is kinda cold to him (tsundere?). She also seems to be curious but not as curious as Eru-chan.
Two kinds of knowledge - mechanical and practical. Rationalism substitutes the former for the whole. Mechanical can be formalized in rules, practical knowledge must be learned from working contact with a carrier of a tradition. (What about what is learned by doing, irrespective of tutleage by a mentor -- isn't "hands on" knowledge the key part of practical knowledge?)
With new accusations mounting daily against the men and women of the community, the girls will have to decide: Is it too late to tell the truth?
I’m an old woman now, and I still remember that one girl, pretty and blond and from the South, didn’t beat me up that day the others jumped me in the alley, going home at lunch time. In fact, Lucy–I don’t forget her name–came over during recess where I stood around, alone as always, to warn, “Listen, Christie says they’re gonna get you. You better take the street–don’t use the alley.”
I cannot marry him…..
Yes, we could have pursued this further. But there was a falling out between certain members of the organisation and after that, things kind of fell apart. Everyone went off in another direction.
One day to go. Thursday morning I receive a message that my North Coast manager has managed to find some medics, as has someone in Durban, and 5 are available in Pietermaritzburg. I proceed to Mighty Men to set up the Field Hospital for Friday morning. Buy sunset the first patients arrive, even though we are only on duty from Friday. Already 60 000 men are on site. My ambulance is dispatched immediately to cover the event during the night, and by sunrise 6 patients have been treated, all minor ailments.
So, what's your favorite beer?
would fit the bill. Next came the matter
To do the work of God we simply* need to believe in Jesus. Everything else follows.
Now, if I could just get that feeling about the papers laying around my house. They just keep coming. School papers, ads from the mail, bills, stuff I need to make a decision or take action on. I also need to finish taxes. They are almost done, but need to force myself to do them.
Exploitation of his daughters (is this “pimping” your daughters? as Obama lovin’ and protectin’ MSNBC once accused Hillary Clinton of doing?) apparently is not enough. Now Obama is entering the various realms of necrophilia as he exploits the dead Trayvon Martin.
In fact, opposition leaders like PKR’s Anwar Ibrahim and DAP’s Karpal Singh were permitted to pass through the police blockades en route to the rendezvous point.
As most of you know, our bags were still off in China after we had arrived home. We filled out a request with United Airlines to find our bags, but after waiting for their five day waiting period, they still had no idea where they were. I emailed our agency to see if they could get us the email of our facilitator in Guangzhou to see if she might be able to help us. They didn't have Helen's email, but they said that since the founders of our agency are Chinese, they may be able to help us by calling China, etc. I talked to "Lily" and told her the story of our bags. She said that since they were on China Southern Airlines when they were "lost" that United probably wouldn't be able to help us. Over the next few days she made many calls to China to see if she could locate our bags. They finally found out that they had been sent back to Guangzhou from Beijing. Our facilitator in Guangzhou went to the airport to see if she could find out what had happened to our luggage. Because of the bad weather and missed/cancelled flights, there were many people who had missing bags. The line at the missing luggage counter was huge. No wonder the people there didn't answer the phone calls that Lily had made to them.
I went straight to the store, which was on my way out of town, to see what I could buy. I also dug out the 10% of coupon and free gait analysis coupon out of the goodie bag and took those in with me.
Judee's comments: Please note that The Parchment Paper Cookbook is not intended to be gluten free nor vegetarian. However, I felt it was such a great idea that it can be applied to any kind of cooking. Personally, I frequently use regular cookbooks for ideas and just adapt and substitute!
Hamilton Leithauser and John Roderick
And the glittery decorations are pretty cool too. But overall its just not for me. So I’ve decided to donate my copy to the next Cake Eaters Anonymous raffle for the next event which is coming up on Sunday.
Khavu was approach by clan speaker Khamar, Khuure’s father. He explained that a human girl had come to challenge her into a fight to death. The girl is named Juma and she belongs to the new clan of Khuure’s of which Kitia Soliaro is now the sole survivor. Like Kitia Juma is using the legend of Urabash to gain her way back after stopping her Selenoren herself. While clan Soliaro doesn’t abide by this legend they recognize that Kitia and Juma do and out of honour they will for this occasion regard the legend as true. Juma must best a warrior of Khuure’s old clan in combat and kill her to be admitted back.
We are, all of us, affected by every single thing that happens to and around us throughout our lives. The people we come into contact with, change us irrevocably, and forever. As we change them.
full of stuff
I think we’ll also spend time reading some of our own words to each other post ceremony. We’ve written so much to each other over the years, we pictured sitting down and compiling some of the truest words that bear repeating.
in all the forbidden places
You will find adorable teddies bears, young boys and girls to fuzzy little bunnies and whimsical critters.
Nelson, who graduated with a Bachelor's of Fine Arts degree from the College of Creative Studies in Detroit, now lives and paints in the mountains of North Carolina. Though also a painter of landscapes and of still-lifes, Nelson's first love is the figure, and in his over-twenty years as a professional artist, he has, in addition to his many figurative gallery pieces, completed over 500 portraits. Among his notable commissions are portraits of former General Motors Chairmen John F. Smith, Jr. and Edward Whitacre, Jr., noted heart surgeon Randolph Chitwood, and distinguished Federal Judge Malcolm Jones Howard.
the Marie Antoinette romances: Joseph Balsamo (Mémoires d’un médecin: Joseph Balsamo, 1846–1848) (a.k.a. Memoirs of a Physician, Cagliostro, Madame Dubarry, The Countess Dubarry, or The Elixir of Life)(Joseph Balsamo has a length of about 1000 pages, and is usually separated into 2 volumes in English translations: Vol 1. Joseph Balsamo and Vol 2. Memoirs of a Physician.)
The Slipknot is a complicated “you-know-it-only-if-you’ve-been-a-scout” kind of knot. Unless you know it, I encourage you to see this link.
Binary Domain is a third-person shooter from Sega. Created by Toshihiro Nagoshi, the producer of the excellent Yakuza series, it spins an interesting sci-fi tale about “Hollow Children” — robots designed to look like humans and programmed to believe they are human. Taking on the role of one Dan Marshall (not, sadly, the British developer of point-and-click adventure funfests Ben There, Dan That and Time Gentlemen, Please!), it’s up to the player to kick lots of robot bottom on the way to tracking down the supposed creator of these illegal, ethically questionable droids.
Hello Thursday Cartridge announcements.
of such early growth. You
Dear creationists, trust me, scientists do know what the hell's going on with the world. They kind of do this for a living. And just for the record, mind you assholes that I also believe in lots of things such as ghosts and stuff, but I'm a skeptic also and if science can explain it I tend to stick to it because....you know....science worked until now.
The Cupcake Collection
KV: How did you get into agenting?
Dennis Quade in The Big Easy
clean out the pots of annuals,
Quick profit!
If I'm right, what you're left with is this: an existing group of readers and subscribers who feel the publications have abandoned them (case in point: the ego-fulfilling guest columns from industry figures have gone by the way side, I'm told) -- and another market that is served quite well elsewhere -- because people in media love nothing more than to write about themselves.
Meanwhile, Sen. Amy Klobuchar (D-Minn.), another member of the Senate Judiciary Committee, has also said she’d vote for repeal of DOMA in committee, although she’s stopped short of co-sponsoring the legislation. Last month, the Minnesota Independent reported that the senator would back the Respect for Marriage Act.
I found the nightstands at Homegoods on clearance, and you can see the full tutorial on how to make the hanging pendant lights here.
5. The Company (2003)-Directed by Robert Altmas, The Company is a rather light-material film centered around a ballet company. There are some scenes that will look familiar to dancers, like the ones showing the dancers all crashing together in one person's apartment, the injuries, and the jealousies. Overall, it is not a great film, but my favorite Altman. Part of the reason I don't rate it higher is Neve Campbell. At any rate, the dancing is nice, it is just more modern than I usually prefer in a ballet. I do love the dancing in the rain sequence that is just marvelous. That scene keeps this one on my top 5 list of ballet films. There are also great performances by an ensamble cast including Malcolm McDowell, James Franco, and William Dick.
I realised that last weekend.
Each of us got a job, my job was to be the customer service, to help with the website (with Kirsty and Sam), help for the costing (with Paula and Callum).
Starting its maturation in a traditional whisky cask, it is then transferred to a first fill European oak sherry cask. Sweet, rich aromas of fruit and honey mix together in your nose, but mellowing out into a smooth blend of raisin, nut and a slight cinnamon hint.
5. If you lost a lot of money, say, over a thousand dollars, you may want to invest in getting an attorney to write the scammer a threatening letter demanding your money back immediately. With PublishAmerica, this won't work. They don't even read such letters. But with some scammers, they have shown that they'll cave under this kind of threat, and refund your money. "Agent F" for example, will usually make a complete refund if the author threatens to inform the Better Business Bureau and local law enforcement of the scam.
I read all sorts of age-inappropriate books when I was a kid, from A Clockwork Orange to The Godfather (page 36, anyway, along with all the other girls in my year). Nobody took any notice--not my parents, not my teachers. I was just reading. What harm could that do?
Thanks again to everyone for entering!!!
But nicely,
Haters gonna hate, but hating something doesn’t make you right. A good example would be the fact that the very thought of Twlight makes me cringe, and I will never read it. Ever. But clearly if so many other people read and enjoy it, there has to be some merit to what Stephenie Meyer has done. Good on her. Will I gain anything by putting her genre choice (YA paranormal) down and claiming mine is better (adult sci-fi/fantasy)? Uh...no.
If you've been to Afin, you'll recognize the unconventional flavors here. This is by no means a traditional sushi joint; whether that's a good thing or not depends on your palate. I personally found the sauces interesting, if not all perfectly complementary, and the nigiri was very generously sliced and fresh. Given that this location is such a convenient spot for me to meet downtowners for lunch, I'll undoubtedly be back, although it'll likely take some persuading for me to venture off the sushi side of the menu.
Two voters from the country-side had gone to the respective camps from where they proceeded to exercise their franchise.
I am working on a review but first, a few images to whet your appetite. There were so many beautiful things that I hardly know where to start. Not just paintings but wallpaper and furniture, illuminated books and etchings, pottery and silver tea sets.
I didn’t even really think I would like this skirt, but since I was looking for something quick and cheap, I figured I’d just try it. Now, I’m really glad I got it! I lurve the colors and the pockets!
My therapist had spoken with her, of course. She didn't actually repeat his verdict of body dysmorphia. I guess she didn't have to.
FOUR DAYS of being without power.
I take him outside, and realize, crap, I REALLY need to rake the lawn, and this was basically the only weekend I had available until next year. So, I brought Oscar inside and started raking (still in my pajamas and entirely unwashed).
Lets just touch on sickness for a moment, then I want to get to those spirally things (smile.) Any sort of fear lowers the vibration within your body… whether it is for 5 minutes or 5 years. Our fears have become vast and we want to blame it on so many things. Food has become a huge culprit of our blame game. ”It’s not me, its the food.” bullshit. It’s you!! The food, whether an allergy or simply a mind construct around it, is reflecting back to you what you need to heal within yourself. We have a tendency to just avoid that food. Much like we avoid people who piss us off. No one on earth can piss us off. We choose to take whatever their trigger was and blame it on them. This decreases the energy vibration within the DNA as well… until we get to a point where we can either no longer move because we are so sick, or because we are so depressed (all that light vibration being held down) we cannot move.
Wanna B thin again...is almost there!
1/4 cup schezwan sauce
For, I was a child, when the great war came,
How would a Republican administration help bring peace to Palestine and Israel when most candidates barely recognize the existence of Palestine or its people? As a Palestinian-American Republican, I’m here to tell you we do exist.
Well first of, its a numbers game. Paganism is one of the fastest growing religious affiliations. We're getting more and more people into this little polytheistic party. Also, it's the type of people we're getting in. One of the fastest growing subsections to is "Reconstructinism," at least to my knowledge. One of the big things most of the reconstructionists have is bringing back the way things were done, which requires a community. It's all well and good to live like our ancestors, but trying to make your way thought the world with the values of a 7th century Scandinavian in a 21st century post modern society isn't easy. There's a lot of cross over, true, but there's a lot of values dissonance. The other is that such paths put a strong emphasis on kinship, at least the "folkish" ones do. Building a community, building family who live and practice as you do.
AO International Fellow (Switzerland)
2. Regular backups of our data and digital images. What is Regular? Simply determine your threshold of pain when considering the loss of your records. That should firmly establish a frequent backup cycle in your mind.
Then again think of opportunity costs and compare utility: If the restaurant spending make up 10% of your budget, and sports only 10% – was the restaurant visits worth it? If yes – fine! If not – cut it down.
Can you help get the word out?
The New York Times is blinded by its hatred of George W. Bush. And, because of this, these boneheads compromise the lives of all Americans.
We want to live big and live now. We want to spend our money. We want to have anything that strikes our fancy – and NOW.
“It seems that almost every bit of data about the health of the US economy has disappointed expectations recently,” said Riddell, in a note sent to CNBC on Wednesday.
It was a no brainer..they said 4 - 6 weeks delivery..(sniffle).. lo and behold 2 days later..it was at our doorstep..
Sieve
Now many would see the statement as anti-corporation. It is not, it is just pro-people like me who have no control over price rise and who do-not grow any food. One does-not wishes to be arm twisted in paying more money. There are already so many problems in India regarding the present situation of land grab, such policies would just aggravate the situation. The farmers are already suffering from different quarters.
The sentence above was first delivered when I was taking my first steps as a toddler, just a decade and a half after the end of WWII. I am trying to think of a speechwriter today who can come close to that kind of forceful simplicity and clarity, with a rhythm and pace that resonates across half a century. I wonder if there is a politician who could stand up today and express a similar concept, even if the rhetoric is not as soaring. It makes lines about receding oceans sound kind of silly.
so a wee Bear I will show you...
We are so spoilt by science that we forget that we're creating life and that in itself needs a pinch of miracle in order to happen.
Objective researchers contend that Iran is not being demonized because they are a nuclear threat, just as the Taliban, Iraq’s Saddam Hussein and Libya’s Muammar Qadaffi were not a threat.
The Guardian Duke.
Honestly, sometimes, I like more being alone. Not that I don’t want to join others but I just want to concentrate on my thoughts and what I am doing. In that way, I can finish all my work. Just as simple as that.
This video has three trainers and three workouts, plus a warm-up and cool down. Those who are bigger fans of Bob Harper would definitely like this one. He delivers one 20-minute cardio segment, plus the 5-minute warm up and cool down. This workout DVD, like the other two, uses moves that exercise multiple muscle groups at one time. You will definitely feel the burn the next day. This one is much more fast-paced than Jillian’s Trouble Zones.
God doesn’t care about governmental paperwork. God cares about those that have chosen to love, honour, serve and cherish one another as Christ did…
I appreciate you all more than you know!
I'm going to talk about Taylor Swift. Specifically why I like her so much.
Whew! What a week! I've been suffering big time with the old RA - bloomin' thing is active again and causing havoc! So I've been a bit slow in making stuff and slower still in my (yet to happen) Christmas preparations. Oh dear! You'd think I didn't know it was all happening in 9 days (eeeek!).
Never seeing the ways I am NOT failing.
We’re all awake and this is our day to return Kokomo so we agree to just get started now. We slip our mooing and point Kokomo toward Roadtown. I sit at the helm in just a pair of shorts as the gentle rain caresses my skin and the overcast eliminates the need for sunglasses. Heading in.
The Angel: Fine beer. Exceptional spirits.
Unsweetened cocoa powder 3/4 cup(75 grams)
But penultimately, fear not – for the Bigwigs have commanded that there will be no contagion. Each politico in turn insisted last night that this is a one-off deal, and will never be done again. In fact, they specifically said that no other peripheral debtor will get this ‘unique’ opportunity to sort itself out, thanks to their financial largesse and jolly hard work to bring this never-to-be repeated offer to fruition.
we don’t belong in each other’s arms,
Everyone loves Gladys Knight, but she’s definitely the weakest dancer currently on ”Dancing with the Stars” season 14. Should Motown Week be her last?
For journal articles, the style required for the reference list should be: Author surname followed by given names with first (or legal) given name in full and others as initials, followed by the year of publication in parentheses, and a full stop/period. The title of the article should not be italicised, and should not be capitalised (other than the first word). The title of the journal should be given in full, not abbreviated, with its principal words beginning with a capital letter, it should be italicised, and should end with a comma. Volume numbers should be given as figures, issue numbers also as figures (preceded by no.) but included in parentheses following the volume number (together with date of issue if relevant, and separated from issue number by a semi-colon), followed by a colon, and then the page numbers, given in full. If the article is in a newspaper, the town or city of publication in parentheses should follow the newspaper's title, and instead of volume numbers, the full date of publication will suffice, followed by the page number(s) if known. Here are some hypothetical examples:
Earrings - Target - gifted
was INVISIBLE and
P.S. I have most Original Music releases, and over time will make them available here. Several of the best ones have been posted already on the eclectically awesome Holy Warbles.
The apple pie bars add variety and they are pretty cute as well. I have been thinking up this creation for a while. Especially since I love apple pie so much, but sometimes, you really don't want (or need) a whole slice of pie. Apple crisp is yummy as well, but sometimes it's hard to portion-control when you feel like you are eating oatmeal. So a cootsie-cut-up apple pie bar might just be a fun way to get the best of both worlds. Plus, these turned out to be melt-in-your-mouth delicious!
(after they had eaten an ostrich burger at the Food Festival) they and the farmer went to the Himalayan Garden and I thought you would be interested in both the concept and the photographs
Ositelu, Rufus Okikiolaolu Olubiyi, African Instituted Churches, London, Transaction Publishers, 2002.
The first time I saw this (second movie) I started feeling sick as the days clicked past. And then the explosion on March 11th was like being punched in the stomach.
I ask only this of you:
A supportive running shoe is a must for any runner, regardless of their experience. Get a proper foot assessment before you pound the pavements again, and remember, it’s not uncommon for pregnant women’s feet to increase by up to a shoe size, so are you sure those trainers you’re about to slip on fit you accordingly?
Apart from those employed in the media, who's job it is to suppress and distort news coverage which does not comply with the official message of a thriving, multicultural paradise, joyfully freed from that shackles of an oppressive racist regime, and those who have regular contact with friend and relatives still living beneath the battered rainbow, regular readers of this blog are amongst a tiny minority of Westerners who are aware that all is not well in South Africa.
Bananas give me the shivers. The way one day they’re all firm and yellow and the next they are a slippery brown mess? And even when they’re ripe they still smell like they could become over-ripe at any minute? Gack.
We told her she was special and beautiful, we saw the beauty.
* These were great cookies I loved that they have a little white chocolate flavor but it didn't overpower the flavor of the cookie. Its a great way to use up any leftover cookies and creme candy bars you might have around the house. Mine were still from Christmas lol I give these a 4 on the scale.
In the world today this is the type of act that doesn't happen nearly often enough! It may have been shared before but this is the first that I am seeing of it.
that families can't care
One problem I've run into: snappis... I have to make sure that there is enough fabric so that the teeth of the snappi can't touch the kid's skin. Poor James started screaming "It hurts!!!! It hurts!!!" after I had put on his alternative kite folded flat and cover and pants. The pressure of the pants made the snappi "bite" his skin... We used a pad fold after that one! Is anyone else running into this issue?
Saturday night was the tradition retiral to the local Chinese buffet conveniently situated between the venue and the con hotel before either a return to Eden Court for a screening of the Edinburgh-set short film Electric Man or back to take over the hotel bar. There were a few bleary eyes the next morning...
I think that the real rogues are going to be the faction that turns against humanity. Even the Rogues band together and work with/hide from the humans. The vampires that declare open war on the species are really going to be the anarchists of the group!
Today, is hard to find people who can truly say a breakup was a mutual agreement between two people. A breakup is more like soap opera, one of the two parties has decided to leave a person for someone or something else. Many people call this confusion but don’t be fooled my friends, I’ve met to many broken hearts that say otherwise. I recall my breakup, the pinch inside your heart when you believe you were dead but somehow still walking. The anxiety attacks, lack of air to your lungs, the lack of sleep at night. Yes, you don’t eat, you think about all the things that you probably did wrong, whether they’re known or unknown. You’re in a search to find the reason of where and why things fell apart. Don’t worry, if you’re a human being you probably committed countless mistakes, that my friend’s is part of life. You will probably spend 100 years searching and you will never find out.
About ten meters off, standing by a car at the side of the road, another lone saxophonist was standing and tootling away. He wasn’t part of the other group – he wasn’t even playing the same tune as they were. He obviously just wanted in on atmos.
Take King Niall of the Nine Hostages, for example. You don’t know about him? He’s the one who kidnapped Saint Patrick.
The point is this, to suggest that there is a list of things that we should be known for is to insist on a rather narrow definition of what a Christian is in the first place. I’ll be honest, at this point in my life I am not called in any way, shape, or form to minister in a special way to people with HIV/AIDS. Ten years from now that might change; ten minutes from now that might change. I am not called to minister to the environment in a special way–that is, I’m not called to tie myself to a tree or protest the wholesale slaughter of cattle or to become a vegan–although I can plant a garden in the spring and grow lots of flowers and enjoy the birds that live in the birdhouses I build. Still, I question whether this is of any significant value. Does God reward me because I built a birdhouse more than if I shared the Gospel? Everyone has to recognize their gift and calling from God. God gives some people great wealth that they might be a blessing to others. God gives some people poverty that they might be blessed by others. You see, for as much as Mr MacLaren wants to define what Christianity is, he is also defining what it is not. Christianity is not merely about the social services we render to the population in general. Christianity is always, first and foremost, about Christ. We do what we will for him because we can, we do what we ought to because we owe it to Him, we do what we ought to because we love him.
But sometimes justice does rear its head, and in the most delightful, outstanding of ways.
Assume the BBC coverage won't extend to a hour of Dick 'effin and jeffin, but it may have actually made me tune in! Love to know what set list he has in store... I wonder if he'll throw in Candle in the Wind, as an inappropriate gesture?!
I placed this prayer in the front of my prayer journal so I will pray it on a regular basis. One morning as I was doing so, I thought back to the poem "A Birthday Moment" which, due to my poetry search, was now fresh in my mind again. And do you know what wonderful thing God brought to my mind? He has answered that prayer that I prayed years ago in the light of the birthday candles. Each one of those four children has now asked Jesus to be their personal Savior. What an encouragement to this Grammy's heart to be reminded of that answered prayer! And what an added incentive to keep on praying for our precious grandchildren.
It is really a morning object now, with the moon starting to drown it out in the early evening.
Because i felt kind of blue yesterday i decided to use my knowledge of colour psychology and to put on something orange. Orange is a colour we associate with fun times and happiness, it´s also the colour of ambition and a new dawn in attitude. Orange is extroverted and uninhibited...So why don´t wear orange every day?
It seems then that the hospital are in the process of securing a cord from the United States to supplement the viable bag from France - this is obviously very positive news and will keep folks posted as to what this means re. new dates for going into hospital.
Aspen: Last month Haruko lived here, but she killed a man with a big knife. There was lots and lots of blood all over the bedroom.
If you have up to 1 third acre, you will require to purchase a cordless mower with a 36 volt rechargeable battery. Another consideration is whether or not or not the battery is removable. If it is, then you can have a backup battery and not have to waste time throughout a recharge.
Light KB complex w/20lbs
I accept we’re all getting older and what’s in the past stays in the past. But sometimes I just have moments where I wish I was sixteen or twenty one again. It’s hardest for me when I listen to music I used to listen to, bands I used to love, cds I wore out until they were thin. Last night I played this Epitaph Records compilation I used to listen to all the time in high school. I’m also not embarrassed I picked up this cd at Hot Topic for $5 either back in 2000. (No shame at this point in life, I’m 27 and I admit they have cute stuff online and cheap Tripp pants. However, I think they are still an evil entity of all things “subculture” but these days, everything is exploited) It is the Punk-o-Rama Volume 5, to be specific. It seriously is one of my fave comps EVER, every song is just awesome and led me to greater and better music. But one song I love from the Beatsteaks “We have to figure it out tonight” made me sing out loud at the top of my lungs on the drive home last night. So much so that I played it three times in a row. Later when I was at home, I looked up their old songs and just lay there in my bed listening to it all.
Gregory: gas prices are high
The album “This Is One Girl” features the rare groove classic (so I am informed by the interweb) “That’s What Friends Are For”. This track is held in such high regard in that genre it got a 45 re-issue on the Jazzman label a few years ago. So is this album a one tracker? Certainly not, in my opinion. The session artists on this album include some erstwhile Blue Minkers, and the credits also read like a who’s who of the UK Library music scene – for instance Alan Hawkshaw, Duncan Lamont, and Alan Parker appear. “That’s What Friends Are For” is credited to Alan Parker/Madeline Bell and there are three other tracks on this album with the same credit that are all worth an admission price of much more than 99p.
“Pan Am” (ABC) Glossy, juicy, sexy, this show is really a lot of fun. The cast is great, the story possibilities are endless and those planes are so damn sexy, I mean, seriously, did ya see the couches in that French chick’s section? Amazing! I wanna live in that world, but, sadly, I just don’t have time to watch it.
There are seventy three constituencies in London. During the debate MPs came and went, but the highest number I saw on the benches at any one time was thirteen. Ten on the opposition benches (all Labour I think) and three on the Government benches (all Tory I think). Maybe another twenty came and went (not sure as I missed the start). Sounds depressing doesn't it? Curiously, it wasn't.
He fell in love with a countess named Sophie, a lady-in-waiting who wasn’t quite blue-blooded enough for a Habsburg, so they carried on secretly for two years and he refused to consider anyone else. Finally Franz Joseph said okay, but it had to be a morganatic marriage. That meant any children would have no claim to the throne. Ferdinand agreed and he and Sophie were married in 1900. Morganatic also meant that Sophie could not share his rank - on any formal occasion Ferdinand would be right next to the Emperor, but Sophie had to stand at the end of the line.
There is a section at the end of the book entitled `How to Make a Quilt`, where Alissa goes through all the basics (tools, piecing, basting, quilting and binding etc.,), which is great for a beginner quilter.
